






















 

 
 

 
 

Active​ ​Search 
Ecosystem 
 

WHITEPAPER, ​ ​ver. ​ ​0.9.10, ​ ​December​ ​2017 

http://www.bitclave.com/ 
 

 

 

DISCLAIMER: This draft Whitepaper is for discussion and pre-information purposes only, provided as a courtesy. The information                                 
contained herein is subject to change, no part of this draft document is legally binding or enforceable, nor is it meant to be, until it has                                                   
been discussed, reviewed and revised by the board of directors, the board of advisors and company lawyers. Please do not copy or                                           
disseminate any part of this document without including this disclaimer. The final version of this Whitepaper will be published as soon as                                           
adopted. 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

In the current $550B ads market, too much money goes to the hidden ad                           

network with too little added value for businesses and customers. BitClave is                       

using blockchain to eliminate ad service “middlemen” and create a direct                     

connection​ ​between​ ​businesses​ ​and​ ​customers.  

 

On the ​BitClave Active Search Ecosystem​, customers control their identity,                   

decide who has access to their data, and are “paid” each time businesses                         

“use”​ ​their​ ​data​ ​to​ ​make​ ​them​ ​offers.  

 

With BitClave, businesses have a direct relationship with customers and can                     

offer a uniquely targeted promotion. With BitClave, an open search                   

marketplace keeps prices fair, and elimination of intermediates brings all                   

value​ ​to​ ​customers​ ​and​ ​businesses. 

 

 

   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 2 

 



 

 

 

Content 
 

Executive​ ​Summary 6 

Problem​ ​Description 7 

Solution​ ​Description 10 

Example​ ​Use​ ​Cases 11 

Lawyers​ ​and​ ​Legal​ ​Advisors 11 

Educational​ ​Degree​ ​Programs 12 

Jobs​ ​Search 12 

Asset​ ​Management 12 

Automotive​ ​Sales 13 

Technical​ ​Solution​ ​Overview 15 

BitClave​ ​Active​ ​Search​ ​Ecosystem​ ​(BASE) 15 

Structure​ ​of​ ​BASE​ ​Activities 16 

Example:​ ​Direct-to-Consumer​ ​Auto​ ​Marketing 19 

Customer​ ​and​ ​Retailer​ ​Anonymity​ ​In​ ​the​ ​Activity​ ​Ledger 20 

Example:​ ​Linking​ ​a​ ​sequence​ ​of​ ​activities​ ​for​ ​multiple​ ​retailers 20 

Consumer​ ​Activity​ ​Token​ ​(CAT) 21 

Tokens​ ​as​ ​Incentive​ ​for​ ​Participation 21 

Retail​ ​Analytics​ ​Providers 21 

Technical​ ​Solution​ ​Details 23 

Main​ ​BASE​ ​components 23 

Registration​ ​subsystem 23 

REQUEST​ ​Subsystem 24 

OFFER​ ​Subsystem 25 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 3 

 



 

 

 

Search​ ​Service 25 

Ranking​ ​&​ ​Anonymization​ ​Services 27 

Ranking​ ​by​ ​Customer​ ​ID 28 

Ranking​ ​by​ ​Pseudonyms​ ​Initiated​ ​by​ ​the​ ​Customer 29 

Third-Party​ ​Ranking​ ​&​ ​Anonymization​ ​Service 30 

Activity​ ​Analytics 32 

BASE​ ​Scalability​ ​and​ ​BASE​ ​NODE​ ​API 32 

Ethereum​ ​Blockchain 33 

Storage​ ​Scalability 34 

Transaction​ ​Speed 35 

Legal 36 

Deployment​ ​Plan 37 

Initial​ ​Development​ ​Efforts 37 

Value​ ​and​ ​Experience​ ​for​ ​Early​ ​Platform​ ​Users 38 

Growth​ ​Plan 38 

New​ ​Opportunity 38 

Fundraiser​ ​And​ ​Token​ ​Distribution 38 

Fundraiser​ ​Schedule 39 

Token​ ​distribution 39 

Benefits​ ​to​ ​Users 39 

Team 4​0 

Executive​ ​Team 4​0 

Expert​ ​Advisors 4​3 

Legal 4​5 

Glossary 4​5 

Activity 4​5 

Anonymized​ ​Activity​ ​Ledger 4​5 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 4 

 



 

 

 

BitClave​ ​Active​ ​Search​ ​Ecosystem​ ​(BASE) 4​5 

Consumer​ ​Activity​ ​Token​ ​(CAT) 4​5 

Retail​ ​Analytics​ ​Provider 4​5 

Selective​ ​Linkability​ ​/​ ​Unlinkability 4​5 

Smart​ ​Contracts 4​6 

Token​ ​Exchange 4​6 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 5 

 



 

 

 

Executive ​ ​Summary 
Bitclave​ ​Active​ ​Search​ ​Ecosystem​ ​Is​ ​A​ ​Platform​ ​That​ ​Enables​ ​Direct 
Customer-to-business​ ​Interactions​ ​With​ ​No​ ​Need​ ​For​ ​Intermediaries 

When it comes to online advertising, businesses are forced to pay exorbitant amounts of money to                               
“middlemen” in order to reach a captive audience for their promotions. However, the promotions often get                               
placed among many other ads clogging up the space on crowded banners, or simply end up in someone’s                                   
spam box. Businesses also have little to no guarantee that the traffic they generate on their promotions is                                   
genuine. In fact, nearly 50% of all advertising traffic is generated by bots, essentially defeating the entire                                 
purpose of advertising. Sellers pay for “impressions, views, and clicks” resulting in extremely low conversion                             
rates,​ ​with​ ​only​ ​a​ ​loose​ ​correlation​ ​to​ ​return​ ​on​ ​investment. 

Offline advertising is a similar story. More often than not, offline advertisers promote content with a “hit or                                   
miss” mass mailer mentality. Hoards of messages are slammed into users' faces with little or no targeting,                                 
resulting in a dubious correlation between offline ad dollars and return on investment. This, along with other                                 
factors such as overwhelming volume, contributes to extremely low conversion rates. Promotions are largely                           
delivered to those who simply do not care for the product or whose attention is likely focused on something                                     
else. 

These ineffective measures, both offline and online, negatively impact the whole service value chain. As                             
companies are forced to pay increasing amounts to “middlemen”, such as Google and Facebook, a direct                               
consequence is higher price markup that consumers have to pay for products and services. Businesses end                               
up​ ​losing​ ​money,​ ​and​ ​consumers​ ​end​ ​up​ ​paying​ ​more​ ​for​ ​less​ ​value,​ ​creating​ ​a​ ​lose-lose​ ​situation. 

In order to counteract these problems, BitClave proposes a system in which the intermediaries are                             
eliminated and interactions are facilitated by the network itself. Instead of paying any “middlemen”,                           
companies automatically make personalized offers directly to consumers based on their explicit search for                           
goods​ ​and​ ​services​ ​using​ ​BitClave's​ ​decentralized​ ​search​ ​application. 

In the BitClave ecosystem, consumers have control over their own data and can choose whether to reveal                                 
their identity or personal information to retailers as part of their search. At the same time, retailers respond to                                     
these searches with targeted promotions, which consumers are compensated for viewing. The resulting                         
market may incentivize consumers to share some personal information, but this type of sharing is not                               
required for successful search. The ecosystem enables users to control their own privacy preferences, unlike                             
“free”​ ​services​ ​like​ ​Google​ ​and​ ​Facebook,​ ​who​ ​often​ ​sell​ ​user​ ​data​ ​to​ ​brokers. 

With the BitClave Active Search Ecosystem in place, selling data is a thing of the past, as companies offer                                     
promotions to consumers firsthand, creating an efficient and rich market economy among consumers and                           
retailers. 

 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 6 

 



 

 

 

Problem ​ ​Description 

 

Figure​ ​1:​ ​In​ ​the​ ​current​ ​advertising​ ​ecosystem,​ ​businesses​ ​are​ ​forced​ ​to​ ​pay​ ​huge​ ​amounts​ ​of​ ​marketing​ ​capital​ ​to​ ​advertising 
“middlemen”,​ ​who​ ​weakly​ ​target​ ​customers​ ​but​ ​provide​ ​little-to-no​ ​direct​ ​value​ ​to​ ​the​ ​customers​ ​they​ ​advertise​ ​to.​ ​For​ ​customers​ ​and 

businesses,​ ​this​ ​is​ ​a​ ​lose-lose​ ​scenario,​ ​while​ ​the​ ​advertising​ ​giants​ ​get​ ​rich​ ​in​ ​the​ ​process. 

 

Today’s​ ​Fragmented​ ​Seller-advertiser-consumer​ ​Value​ ​Chain  
Misses​ ​The​ ​Market​ ​Opportunity 

Advertising—a market worth nearly 550 billion dollars —is broken. Businesses today contend with myriad                         
1

middlemen across the advertising stack. The dominant advertising companies (e.g., Google, Amazon,                       
Facebook) charge exorbitant fees to businesses trying to find customers. Businesses receive no guarantee                           
that​ ​their​ ​ads​ ​will​ ​convert​ ​to​ ​sales​ ​or​ ​even​ ​that​ ​their​ ​ad​ ​traffic​ ​​ ​is​ ​genuine—in​ ​fact,​ ​nearly​ ​50​ ​percent​ ​of​ ​all​ ​ad  

traffic is generated by bots, essentially defeating the purpose of advertising . The more businesses pay for                               
2

1 ​ ​​Statista, ​ ​“Global ​ ​Advertising ​ ​Market​ ​- ​ ​Statistics ​ ​& ​ ​Facts”,​ ​Available 
https://www.statista.com/topics/990/global-advertising-market/​,​ ​accessed ​ ​June ​ ​15,​ ​2017. 
 
2Incapsula, “Bot Traffic Report 2016”, Available ​https://www.incapsula.com/blog/bot-traffic-report-2016.html ​, January               
2017.  

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 7 

 

https://www.statista.com/topics/990/global-advertising-market/
https://www.incapsula.com/blog/bot-traffic-report-2016.html


 

 

 

ads, the more money consumers have to pay for products. Businesses end up losing money and consumers                                 
end​ ​up​ ​paying​ ​more​ ​for​ ​less​ ​value,​ ​creating​ ​the​ ​lose-lose​ ​situation​ ​captured​ ​in​ ​Figure​ ​1 

Large online advertising companies are also missing the enormous market opportunity because they are not                             
motivated to optimize the seller-consumer value chain (i.e., conversions). These companies instead work                         
tirelessly to maximize their own profits by increasing the price of desirable ad placements and click-through                               
rates, while hoarding their troves of user data behind walled-gardens of fragmented, proprietary                         
ad-networks. 

Today’s​ ​centralized​ ​ad​ ​networks​ ​impede​ ​market​ ​growth​ ​because​ ​they​ ​aren't​ ​optimized​ ​for 
seller-to-consumer​ ​conversions. 

 

Global​ ​Markets​ ​Demand​ ​Solutions​ ​That​ ​Respect​ ​Consumer​ ​Privacy.  
But​ ​Personal​ ​Data​ ​Is​ ​Valuable​ ​And​ ​Doesn’t​ ​Come​ ​For​ ​Free. 

Large online ad companies are also facing regulatory pressure to protect consumer privacy. Recent changes                             
to the ePrivacy Directive ​and the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) ​in the European Union (EU)                               3

4

highlight the emerging trend of governments forcing technology companies to build-in consumer privacy by                           
design. 

It is well known that actionable customer data has intrinsic value. Allowing customers to control their own                                 
data and providing incentives for them to share their data in a controlled, privacy-respecting way using                               
blockchain​ ​creates​ ​new​ ​opportunities​ ​for​ ​customers​ ​while​ ​respecting​ ​regulations. 

Global-market privacy requirements are a key near-term driver for technology solutions enabling                       
anonymized​ ​search​ ​over​ ​large​ ​consumer​ ​datasets. 

3See, ​ ​for ​ ​example, ​ ​the ​ ​draft ​ ​proposal​ ​to ​ ​update ​ ​the ​ ​ePrivacy ​ ​Directive, ​ ​available ​ ​at 
https://ec.europa.eu/digital-single-market/en/news/proposal-regulation-privacy-and-electronic-communications​. 
4 ​ ​​EU ​ ​General ​ ​Data ​ ​Protection ​ ​Regulation ​ ​(GDPR),​ ​​http://www.eugdpr.org 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 8 

 

https://ec.europa.eu/digital-single-market/en/news/proposal-regulation-privacy-and-electronic-communications
http://www.eugdpr.org/


 

 

 

A​ ​Brief​ ​History​ ​Of​ ​Advertising:​ ​Markets​ ​That​ ​Stifle​ ​Innovation  
Are​ ​Always​ ​Susceptible​ ​To​ ​Technology​-​based​ ​Disruption 
Advertising has emerged as a crucial component of business operations. The global spread of the printing                               
press, one of the key inventions of modern society that enshrined content publishing as a new branch of                                   
media,​ ​is​ ​incomplete​ ​without​ ​an​ ​account​ ​of​ ​the​ ​role​ ​of​ ​content​ ​marketing. 

The history and evolution of advertising has tracked, and in many cases has been the impetus and driver for,                                     
progress in communications technology. The yellow pages, a collection of print directories for businesses                           
that​ ​played​ ​an​ ​important​ ​role​ ​in​ ​extending​ ​telephony​ ​to​ ​enterprise,​ ​was​ ​funded​ ​by​ ​selling​ ​advertising​ ​space. 

The rise of the Internet accelerated the reach of advertising but also changed the ways people respond to                                   
ads. Yahoo, once the de facto ingress point for the Internet, was in many ways the digital analog of the                                       
yellow​ ​pages​ ​and​ ​the​ ​bridge​ ​to​ ​today's​ ​Internet​ ​landing​ ​pages. 

The media for advertising have become more efficient with time but the core function of advertising, creating                                 
relevant connections between people and services, has seen only marginal improvement. Search and social                           
media—although distinct in their customer facing services and revolutionary in their rich knowledge and                           
social structure—follow a very similar business model dating back to before Yahoo and the yellow pages. As                                 
the goal of online advertising is to connect business with relevant customers, service providers and business                               
spend significant portions of their marketing budgets on ad impressions, page views, and click-throughs.                           
This approach only loosely translates to business sales or customer value. This is largely due to the                                 
combination of popular “free” web services and the murky web of hidden ad networks, resulting in a wide                                   
and costly gulf between the two parties. We argue that the advertising model of the "middleman" is not only                                     
unnecessary​ ​but​ ​potentially​ ​detrimental​ ​to​ ​business​ ​value​ ​and​ ​reputation. 

The next step in the evolution of advertising is truly revolutionary. Blockchain is a powerful emerging                               
technology that enables mutually distrusting parties to engage in mutually beneficial co-enterprise without                         
the requirement of a central authority. We believe that a blockchain-based system is well suited for enabling                                 
customers and businesses to directly connect in mutually beneficial market activity throughout the entire                           
promotion-to-purchase value chain. Decentralized search is the next step in this progression of advertising                           
as a medium for people and businesses to connect. BitClave applies these powerful design patterns to                               
reimagine a more transparent and meaningful medium for people and businesses to engage in value                             
creation. 

With decentralized search, previously wasted ad dollars are redirected to promotions that reach customers                           
who are genuinely interested in the products being sold and rewards programs that are truly suitable for                                 
customer desires. With a well-devised blockchain system, customer profiles can be elevated from shadowy                           
privacy-invasive metadata, owned and controlled by third parties, into search metadata owned by customers                           
and selectively revealed only when relevant to the search, creating a privacy-friendly marketplace where                           
customers and businesses share in value creation. By storing customer data in a protected way on the public                                   
blockchain (i.e., providing anonymity and selective data sharing), new forms of rewards and loyalty programs                             
can​ ​emerge. 

 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 9 

 



 

 

 

The advertising industry is once again ripe for technology-enabled disruption. BitClave technology enables                         
1) scalable search over huge datasets; 2) data privacy and customer anonymity; and 3) incentives to                               
participate​ ​in​ ​the​ ​advertising​ ​market. 

 

 

Figure​ ​2:​ ​In​ ​the​ ​BitClave​ ​Active​ ​Search​ ​Ecosystem​ ​(BASE),​ ​businesses​ ​directly​ ​market​ ​to​ ​customers​ ​whose​ ​searches​ ​align​ ​with​ ​the 
goods​ ​and​ ​services​ ​being​ ​offered.​ ​Customers​ ​can​ ​earn​ ​CAT​ ​tokens​ ​for​ ​interacting​ ​with​ ​directly​ ​targeted​ ​ads,​ ​while​ ​businesses​ ​get 

stronger​ ​customer​ ​leads.​ ​The​ ​entire​ ​matching​ ​process​ ​is​ ​facilitated​ ​through​ ​the​ ​BASE​ ​activity​ ​ledger,​ ​which​ ​protects​ ​private 
customer​ ​data​ ​and​ ​allows​ ​selective​ ​data​ ​sharing. 

 

Solution ​ ​Description 
Bitclave’s​ ​Decentralized​ ​Search​ ​Ecosystem​ ​Realizes​ ​Unparalleled 
Market​ ​Efficiency​ ​Across​ ​The​ ​Customer​-​to​-​business​ ​Value​ ​Chain 

The vision of decentralized search is achieved by supporting distributed, customer-driven collection of                         
customer activities on the blockchain. Using online data collected in an ​anonymized activity ledger as well as                                 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 10 

 



 

 

 

profiles and preferences that are posted and maintained by customers directly, BitClave is creating a                             
token-based ecosystem for demand-driven marketing and retail with a low barrier to entry for all parties. This                                 
ecosystem utilizes the strengths of traditional online advertising, the widespread ability to generate and                           
share user data and the far reach of the internet, but removes the hurdles traditionally present in the digital                                     
ad​ ​space,​ ​namely​ ​privacy​ ​infringement,​ ​untrusted​ ​sources​ ​of​ ​data,​ ​and​ ​expensive​ ​third-party​ ​ad​ ​networks.  

BitClave’s solution enables companies big and small to participate in an open ecosystem. Our innovative                             
decentralized search technology is market driven, meaning businesses can optimize marketing investment                       
with real results, consumers are incentivized to participate, and anonymity and data privacy are in the hands                                 
of each individual party. As shown in Figure 2, this ecosystem creates a win-win situation for customers and                                   
businesses,​ ​while​ ​eliminating​ ​the​ ​need​ ​for​ ​advertising​ ​middlemen. 

BitClave makes it possible for the first time to optimize the seller-consumer value chain. In the ​BitClave                                 
Active Search Ecosystem (BASE), market economics drive incentives for data sharing that properly balances                           
the tradeoff between market efficiency and personal privacy. Data still has immense value, but consumers                             
and businesses have the power of choosing whether or not to share it. By eliminating forced data sharing                                   
and wasted revenue from today’s large advertising network solutions, everyone wins. BitClave’s open BASE                           
ecosystem​ ​ensures​ ​innovation​ ​will​ ​continue​ ​in​ ​the​ ​advertising​ ​market​ ​as​ ​technology​ ​continues​ ​to​ ​evolve. 

 

Example​ ​Use​ ​Cases 
The potential for disruptive applications built on our BASE platform are significant. To highlight the BASE                               
architecture and potential benefits, we illustrate several example use cases as well as a detailed case study                                 
in the automotive sales retail space, with mixed online and offline components. Our choice of use cases is                                   
partially informed by the “cost-per-click” data corresponding to how much a business has to pay Google                               
everytime a user clicks on their ad . The most expensive keywords, including “lawyer”, “insurance”, and                             

5

“degree”, are in the range of $45-60 per click, regardless of who is clicking or whether they follow up with                                       
the business. Each example is further built around the main idea that personal information collection is                               
crucial for high quality targeted offers. Since personal information can be contributed to BASE in various                               
ways, including in the user registration process and as part of search requests, we particularly highlight the                                 
roles​ ​of​ ​anonymization,​ ​data​ ​protection,​ ​and​ ​customer​ ​consent. 

Lawyers​ ​and​ ​Legal​ ​Advisors 
Due to the unique and varied nature of legal cases, sharing personal data can be critical in finding the right                                       
professional for the job. With each individual case full of nuanced information, it's challenging for people to                                 
communicate all of the details and for a lawyer to have enough information to make informed decisions,                                 
especially in the early stages of a relationship. In situations like this, personal data can help legal                                 
professionals determine if they could be a good match for the potential client. BASE supports the ability for a                                     
user to post personal information and transaction history in a protected way, such that the user can later                                   
choose to share selected information with a potential legal professional. If particular user data would be                               
useful to the legal professional, the user can choose to reveal it to them, without revealing it publicly. This                                     

5 ​ ​​E. ​ ​Gabbert, ​ ​“The ​ ​25 ​ ​Most ​ ​Expensive ​ ​Keywords ​ ​in​ ​AdWords ​ ​– ​ ​2017​ ​Edition!”,​ ​July ​ ​2017, 
http://www.wordstream.com/blog/ws/2017/06/27/most-expensive-keywords 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 11 

 

http://www.wordstream.com/blog/ws/2017/06/27/most-expensive-keywords


 

 

 

data may further allow the legal professional to target more desirable clients and personalize offers of                               
service​ ​to​ ​them. 

 

Educational​ ​Degree​ ​Programs 
In the crowded marketplace of educational institutions promoting similar features and benefits, it can be                             
difficult for a potential student to discover which school is the best fit. When the largest universities with                                   
significant advertising budgets can outbid smaller institutions for advertising space, these smaller schools                         
lose opportunities to connect with students who might be a perfect match for their community. Students are                                 
missing out on information that can help them make the right decision, while institutions of higher learning                                 
are struggling to meet enrollment goals. Schools are turning to new technology to help find the right                                 
students who fit their academic and community profiles, and they are spending thousands of dollars on                               
advertising​ ​with​ ​the​ ​hope​ ​of​ ​reaching​ ​interested​ ​students.  

Suppose a student is about to graduate from high school, and they are searching for a program in Biology at                                       
a university near their home town. Using BASE, they can search for Biology degree programs, and                               
information already stored privately in their BASE profile can guide potential university admissions                         
coordinators to respond to their search with details of their highly relevant program, rather than finding the                                 
institutions that spend the most on advertising. Unlike third-party networks, BASE creates more relevant                           
connections between the student and degree program based on the ability to selectively share the most                               
relevant information for the search. The student can now choose to engage with personalized ads identified                               
through BASE and earn CAT tokens to support further searches or even to pay program application fees, if                                   
supported by the school. More importantly, because the student has received the specifically targeted ad,                             
they know that the school is interested in their application, building confidence in the match and motivating                                 
the​ ​beginning​ ​of​ ​a​ ​fruitful​ ​relationship. 

 

Jobs​ ​Search 
Similar to the use case of matching students seeking to further their education, BASE can be used as a job                                       
search platform. Job seekers can use the BASE decentralized search platform to search for employers, while                               
employers can find potential employees with particular skill sets. Of particular value in the hypercompetitive                             
technology job space, BASE can be used as a sort of “reverse job search”, where job seekers can                                   
anonymously post their job interests and core skill sets, and employers can target particular job seekers of                                 
interest to advertise custom-designed job positions tailored to fit the needs of the company and the unique                                 
skills of the employee. This is a sharp contrast to traditional job search boards where employers post generic                                   
“Software​ ​Engineer”​ ​job​ ​positions​ ​that​ ​lead​ ​to​ ​high​ ​turnover​ ​rates​ ​within​ ​the​ ​company. 

 

Local​ ​Community​ ​Services 
As an extension of the above job search usecase, BASE can be used for local community low cost                                   
peer-to-peer search for low cost services. For example: tutoring, babysitting, dog walking services offered by                             

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 12 

 



 

 

 

teens or students within the local community. BASE can be used as an accessible, free platform where                                 
young people can advertise the services they offer or fulfill some requested services. In this use case the                                   
emphasis is not on high skill jobs, but on peer-to-peer local community errand-like tasks, that in addition to                                   
the​ ​value​ ​of​ ​executing​ ​the​ ​task​ ​itself​ ​also​ ​assist​ ​in​ ​building​ ​local​ ​community. 

 

Asset​ ​Management 
Planning for retirement is on the minds of many working professionals. However, personal finance records                             
are highly private and many are not comfortable providing this information through unsecured channels.                           
Without the personal information of the individual, it can be challenging for asset managers, financial                             
planners, and loan officers to provide the most accurate information to their potential clients, leading to                               
missed opportunities for both parties. An individual looking for a financial planner using BASE can search for                                 
firms who specialize in specific income ranges or investment strategies and make key personal financial                             
metrics viewable only to those firms who meet the individual's criteria. A search for financial planning firms                                 
will return results from businesses that have identified the individual as an ideal client, and when the                                 
individual interacts with the offers and opts in to sharing their data through the secured BASE platform, the                                   
business​ ​can​ ​customize​ ​and​ ​personalize​ ​their​ ​service​ ​offers. 

 

 

 

Automotive​ ​Sales 
We’ll describe the automotive sales use case in greater details as it presents several unique challenges that                                 
our BASE platform can address. As in many sectors, customer acquisition is a business-critical and costly                               
sales component. In the car dealership industry, this factor is key to operating a successful distribution                               
network. Automotive dealers typically spend up to $200 per qualified lead by promotion on general-purpose                             
online referral sources (like Google AdSense or Facebook’s Audience Network) and dealership-facing                       
products for popular customer-facing car information and pricing services like TrueCar—with the                       
automotive-focused gateways for leads being both more costly and more effective than the general-purpose                           
gateways. 

They compete via keyword on a national, regional and local basis against other dealers, as well as against                                   
other automotive-related services such as leasing, insurance and financing. This digital advertising is                         
combined with traditional marketing that includes local broadcast, radio, billboards and sponsorships. It is                           
also supported by the conventional regional dealers association, where local dealers pool marketing dollars                           
to enable greater ad buying efficiency in a particular area as well as pool data resources such as customer                                     
purchase history. All this adds up to an expensive, complicated, competitive environment. An environment                           
that moves consistently in favor of supply, not demand. So even as the overall margins on new vehicle sales                                     
has declined, the cost of customer acquisition has tightened, impairing the dealers ability to operate                             
successfully.​ ​This​ ​cost​ ​pressure​ ​is​ ​only​ ​heightened​ ​by​ ​the​ ​rapid​ ​depreciation​ ​rate​ ​of​ ​car​ ​lot​ ​vehicles. 

In practice, several hundred dollars is often the threshold between a lost lead or a happy customer leaving                                   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 13 

 



 

 

 

the lot in a new car. Today, car dealers provide benefits such as a $100 prepaid gas card or six months of                                           
roadside assistance service to help close deals. Additionally, these “deal sweeteners” are provided to car                             
dealerships themselves by the automotive-focused referral services as incentives to justify their high                         
membership costs. In terms of sales and satisfied customers, the budget spent on acquiring leads is better                                 
spent on direct promotion offers to the customer. The BASE platform, facilitating direct customer-to-business                           
engagement and innately vetting leads for quality, is precisely the solution for redirecting wasteful targeting                             
expenses​ ​to​ ​enhanced​ ​customer​ ​relations. 

In the BitClave Ecosystem, illustrated using the mobile app mockup in Figure 3, an automotive dealership will                                 
have the opportunity to display their promotions and advertisements directly to a potential buyer using                             
precise, data-driven targeting. At the same time, the dealership will be guaranteed that their content is                               
viewed by legitimate buyers, rather than random parties who are uninterested in the content or bots. The                                 
dealership will have the option to filter potential customers by a wide variety of factors, including examples                                 
such​ ​as​ ​owning​ ​a​ ​car​ ​for​ ​more​ ​than​ ​two​ ​years​ ​or​ ​having​ ​a​ ​child​ ​who​ ​recently​ ​reached​ ​the​ ​legal​ ​driving​ ​age. 

 

 

(a) (b) 

Figure​ ​3:​ ​A​ ​mockup​ ​of​ ​the​ ​BitClave​ ​decentralized​ ​search​ ​application​ ​on​ ​a​ ​mobile​ ​device​ ​includes​ ​(a)​ ​a​ ​streamlined​ ​search​ ​interface​ ​and 
shows​ ​the​ ​user​ ​how​ ​many​ ​CAT​ ​tokens​ ​they​ ​have​ ​earned​ ​that​ ​are​ ​available​ ​to​ ​use​ ​in​ ​the​ ​BASE​ ​system.​ ​After​ ​searching​ ​for​ ​a​ ​product​ ​or 

service,​ ​the​ ​app​ ​presents​ ​(b)​ ​potential​ ​offers​ ​with​ ​CAT​ ​incentives​ ​for​ ​viewing​ ​the​ ​offer​ ​details. 

 

One of the major benefits to the dealership of using the activity ledger in BASE to record interactions                                   
between the dealership and their customers is that relevant data about customer purchasing history and                             
preferences are securely stored in the ledger. This data can provide valuable insight to the dealership                               
marketing team, including when to resume advertising to a previous customer, when to offer service                             

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 14 

 



 

 

 

discounts, or what types of accessories the customer is interested in. Data stored in the BASE ledger may                                   
further indicate a customer’s “rating” that relates to the frequency of interacting with ads and the associated                                 
conversion rate. With access to these ratings, the dealership can assess the value of advertising to each                                 
customer, in order to optimize their advertising strategy and return on investment. For instance, if the                               
customer rates highly on viewing ads and promotions but low on conversion after viewing them, the                               
business may decline to further target the customer due to low chance of resulting in a purchase. Similarly,                                   
analyzing customer activity over time may allow a dealership to learn which promotions are successful,                             
enabling them to improve services and promotions in a cost-effective manner and again maximizing return                             
on investment. These examples demonstrate the value of the BASE platform over traditional advertising                           
models,​ ​even​ ​for​ ​the​ ​complex​ ​and​ ​competitive​ ​world​ ​of​ ​auto​ ​sales.   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 15 

 



 

 

 

Technical ​ ​Solution​ ​Overview 
Bitclave​ ​Is​ ​A​ ​Startup​ ​Company​ ​Based​ ​In​ ​Mountain​ ​View,​ ​California, 
Providing​ ​Seamless​ ​Customer​ ​Rewards​ ​And​ ​Payments​ ​Solutions 

One of the primary innovations that BitClave is focusing on is a distributed blockchain-based system, called                               
the BitClave Active Search Ecosystem (BASE), where every participant in the BASE system is incentivised by                               
Consumer​ ​Activity​ ​Tokens​ ​(CAT). 

The initial vision for the BASE and CAT is based on Ethereum technology—an open source,                             
blockchain-based, distributed computing platform which utilizes smart contracts. These cryptographically                   
secure smart contracts are stateful applications stored in the Ethereum blockchain, fully capable of enforcing                             
performance. While Ethereum is the initial target, we may transition to a different blockchain technology if                               
appropriate.​ ​See​ ​more​ ​details​ ​on​ ​the​ ​potential​ ​alternative​ ​blockchain​ ​technologies​ ​in​ ​the​ ​section​ ​below. 

 

BitClave​ ​Active​ ​Search​ ​Ecosystem​ ​(BASE) 
BASE relies on blockchain for storage and management of vast amounts of data related to customer                               
activities in the search ecosystem. These activities are created by software endpoints operated by either the                               
customers themselves or by the retailers they interact with. As such, various forms of software applications                               
including retail websites and marketing dashboards can read to and write from the blockchain; for example                               
these integrations could be used to build valuable audience matching knowledge based on customer                           
preferences and shared demographic information, or to learn about the businesses that offer a particular                             
product. As the BASE ecosystem is decentralized and open, anyone can create such software that interacts                               
with customer and business data published to the blockchain. Instead of releasing and selling this data to                                 
monolithic advertising service providers, businesses and customers have control over the data they                         
contribute to the blockchain as well as whether the data is shared publicly or protected cryptographically,                               
with​ ​access​ ​further​ ​controlled​ ​by​ ​the​ ​user. 

 

Of particular note, user-facing software has the capability to anonymize information contributed to the                           
blockchain, creating what we refer to as the anonymous activity ledger. Activity anonymization is done in a                                 
way that allows only authorized parties to attribute multiple activities to the same customer. For all other                                 
parties, the data is not attributable to specific individuals (or linkable beyond certain lengths of times) while                                 
remaining valuable for statistical and data aggregation purposes. This gives the customer control over what                             
data is allowed to be created, shared, and accessed, all managed and enforced through the use of                                 
blockchain​ ​and​ ​smart​ ​contracts. 

 

As the anonymized activity ledger is the foundation of the BASE retail infrastructure, providing a                             
decentralized capability for the crowdsourcing and sharing of data describing anonymized customer and                         

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 16 

 



 

 

 

retailer activity, it facilitates a variety of analytics capabilities that leverage activity data from customers,                             
stores, mobile apps, websites, and other sources across different retail domains. As previously mentioned,                           
any party can contribute (potentially anonymized) data to the activity ledger, and any party can potentially                               
get value from the data, depending on whether the contributor has encrypted or masked the data in any                                   
way. Similarly, the value of a given data asset (valued in CATs) can be owned by a customer, business, third                                       
party service provider, or some combination as specified by the smart contract whereas control over use and                                 
disclosure​ ​of​ ​personally​ ​identifiable​ ​data​ ​is​ ​retained​ ​by​ ​the​ ​user. 

Users may contribute data to the activity ledger in many different ways. They can initiate a profile, including                                   
personal information such as demographics (e.g., age, income bracket, city/region of residence) as well as                             
search preferences, interests, and any additional information they feel is relevant to their search.                           
Furthermore, when a user posts such information, they can choose to post it in the clear (so it is truly public)                                         
or protected cryptographically, which may allow them to selectively reveal their personal information to                           
some,​ ​but​ ​not​ ​all,​ ​retailers. 

Additional​ ​sources​ ​of​ ​data​ ​include 

- the history of the searches for goods and services through user-facing applications, as each search                             
query​ ​is​ ​published​ ​to​ ​the​ ​blockchain, 

- and actual business transactions between customers searching for products or services and                       
providers​ ​of​ ​such​ ​products​ ​or​ ​services. 

Again, the user can configure how information is revealed or protected within the search queries, for                               
example by anonymizing their identity or applying cryptographic protections to the search terms or metadata                             
fields. 

In addition to explicit searches, users can indirectly contribute activity data related to visiting websites                             
through the use of authorization buttons, similar to the “Login with Facebook” button that authorizes a                               
third-party website to authenticate/authorize a user using their Facebook credentials. For example, a user                           
browsing on their favorite retail website can create a record of this activity by clicking a “Record My Visit to                                       
BASE” button, hosted by the retail website, that posts their browsing activity to the activity ledger on their                                   
behalf. This type of activity sharing is still controlled by the customer, as clicking on the button represents a                                     
sort of “opt in” to sharing this activity to the blockchain. As such, this capability would rely on suitable                                     
authentication and authorization protocols, such as OAuth, to ensure that the retailer cannot post without the                               
user’s​ ​consent. 

 

Structure​ ​of​ ​BASE​ ​Activities 
In order for activities posted to BASE to be useful to interested parties, activity entries posted to the ledger                                     
should adhere to a standard format. While the official definition of this format will be determined at a later                                     
time, at a minimum, each activity entry should include (1) an activity tag to identify the type of entry, (2) the                                         
unique identifier (e.g., hash of the user’s public key or a suitable anonymized substitute) of the user, (3) any                                     
descriptive details required for the activity type, and (4) a timestamp. An initial list of supported activity types                                   
and corresponding metadata entries will be provided, but the BASE community will be free to define and                                 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 17 

 



 

 

 

introduce​ ​new​ ​activity​ ​types​ ​as​ ​the​ ​ecosystem​ ​grows.  

Examples​ ​of​ ​initial​ ​activity​ ​types​ ​include: 

 

REQUEST 
Customer-facing software can publish a shopping preference, item of interest, or personal                       
preference reflecting an intent to purchase goods or services. An example of metadata                         
supporting a REQUEST is the timeframe for the purchase, which would imply an expiration                           
data/time​ ​of​ ​the​ ​search. 

 

OFFER 
Retailer-facing software can publish a short-term offer for discounted items or services,                       
either publicly or targeting specific users based on REQUEST activities. OFFERs can include                         
similar​ ​metadata​ ​as​ ​REQUESTs,​ ​for​ ​example​ ​to​ ​represent​ ​a​ ​limited-time​ ​offer. 

 

VIEW 
Customer and retailer facing software interact, where the customer facing side publishes a                         
unique confirmation (Proof-of-View) that the customer viewed the offer and the business side                         
verifies that the confirmation corresponds to the correct OFFER. A confirmed VIEW event will                           
trigger​ ​CAT​ ​reward​ ​from​ ​retailer​ ​to​ ​customer​ ​for​ ​viewing​ ​the​ ​OFFER. 

 

BUY 
Customer software can publish an activity to indicate the user has executed a purchase from                             
a particular retailer, possibly including descriptions of the item(s) purchased, price, seller,                       
etc.,​ ​any​ ​of​ ​which​ ​can​ ​be​ ​cryptographically​ ​protected​ ​for​ ​selective​ ​access. 

 

SELL 
A retailer’s point-of-sale software can publish an activity (possibly corresponding to a user’s                         
BUY activity) to indicate a sale has been made, possibly including similar details as a BUY                               
activity, again noting that any or all data fields could be cryptographically protected for                           
selective​ ​access. 

Note that certain activities (e.g., BUY/SELL), although implying a counterpart activity, may or may not appear                               
in pairs, as either party can choose not to publish their respective activity to the ledger. This basic format for                                       
an​ ​activity​ ​is​ ​shown​ ​in​ ​the​ ​following​ ​table,​ ​including​ ​a​ ​description​ ​of​ ​each​ ​field​ ​in​ ​the​ ​right​ ​column. 

 

 

 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 18 

 



 

 

 

Activity:  <act_tag>  Tag ​ ​used ​ ​to​ ​reference ​ ​this ​ ​activity​ ​from ​ ​elsewhere 

Orginator:  <cust_tag>  Anonymized ​ ​tag ​ ​used ​ ​to​ ​reference ​ ​activity ​ ​originator 

Activity  <activity_type>  Activity​ ​type,​ ​e.g.,​ ​REQUEST,​ ​BUY,​ ​SELL,​ ​etc. 

Activity ​ ​details:  <list-of-details>  Details​ ​of ​ ​activity​ ​(e.g.,​ ​what​ ​was ​ ​purchased​ ​and​ ​for​ ​how ​ ​much) 

Timestamp:  <time>  Time ​ ​that​ ​activity ​ ​was​ ​observed ​ ​(using ​ ​UTC ​ ​or​ ​similar) 

 
Figure​ ​4:​ ​Activities​ ​posted​ ​to​ ​the​ ​ledger​ ​as​ ​blockchain​ ​entries​ ​include​ ​various​ ​pieces​ ​of​ ​information​ ​including​ ​an​ ​activity​ ​reference,​ ​a 

(potentially​ ​anonymized)​ ​tag​ ​identifying​ ​the​ ​​ ​creator​ ​of​ ​the​ ​activity,​ ​and​ ​a​ ​variety​ ​of​ ​details​ ​about​ ​the​ ​activity. 

 

To illustrate the activity data format, we illustrate potential activity blocks that would be created in an online                                   
search for a new car, where <angle brackets> are used to indicate fields that may be encrypted or otherwise                                     
protected. 

 

Activity 
4E773C91 

  Activity 
36EA9801 

  Activity 
4E773C91 

Organizator:  <A>  Organizator:  <A>  Organizator:  <A> 

Activity:  REQUEST  Activity:  VIEW  Activity:  BUY 

Activity​ ​details:  Toyota​ ​Corolla  Activity 
details: 

PoV​ ​code: 
0×236831156 

Activity 
details: 

QR​ ​code​ ​from 
dealership 

Timestamp:  1496318700 ​ ​UTC  Timestamp:  1496318885 
UTC 

Timestamp:  1496318943 ​ ​UTC 

 

Figure​ ​5:​ ​Examples​ ​of​ ​activity​ ​entries​ ​in​ ​the​ ​leger​ ​include​ ​a​ ​search​ ​request​ ​for​ ​a​ ​new​ ​car,​ ​a​ ​potential​ ​customer​ ​viewing​ ​a​ ​targeted​ ​ad, 
and​ ​a​ ​customer​ ​purchase.​ ​Each​ ​activity​ ​includes​ ​(potentially​ ​anonymized​ ​or​ ​otherwise​ ​protected)​ ​entries​ ​about​ ​the​ ​interaction. 

 

The relevant activities themselves (indicating the search, advertisement offer, visit to dealership website, and                           
purchase) already provide useful customer data to the auto dealership and its current and future customers.                               
In particular, even without knowing the customer’s true identity or specific details of their search or web visit                                   
(or by replacing these with random numbers in the anonymous ledger), any party can use the activity type                                   
and timestamp fields to perform basic retail analytics, such as the relative number of purchases to ad offers                                   
(a​ ​proxy​ ​for​ ​the​ ​ad​ ​conversion​ ​rate​ ​or​ ​customer​ ​sentiment​ ​about​ ​the​ ​dealership). 
 
Other entries and data in the activity block can be encrypted or anonymized to protect identifying                               

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 19 

 



 

 

 

information​ ​or​ ​other​ ​sensitive​ ​data 

This example of direct marketing between car dealerships and customers interested in buying vehicles                           
demonstrates the B2C interaction that BASE and the anonymous activity ledger enable. We further elaborate                             
on​ ​this​ ​example​ ​to​ ​demonstrate​ ​how​ ​this​ ​interaction​ ​would​ ​work​ ​in​ ​an​ ​end-to-end​ ​example. 

Example:​ ​Direct-to-Consumer​ ​Auto​ ​Marketing 
Direct marketing can leverage explicit REQUEST activities created by potential customers, as illustrated                         
below. Retailers can analyze numerous REQUESTs posted on the ledger to identify potential customer                           
matches and create direct-to-consumer advertisements or discounts using OFFER activities. To act on an                           
OFFER that matches a customer’s stated REQUEST, they can create a smart contract with the retailer that                                 
includes incentives for viewing the ad, visiting the store (e.g., test driving a car), or further interaction                                 
retailer-customer interaction. From the retailer’s perspective, providing these incentives to the potential                       
customer​ ​is​ ​likely​ ​far​ ​less​ ​costly​ ​with​ ​higher​ ​return​ ​on​ ​investment​ ​compared​ ​to​ ​paying​ ​an​ ​ad​ ​service​ ​provider. 

 

 

 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 20 

 



 

 

 

Figure​ ​6:​ ​We​ ​illustrate​ ​the​ ​flow​ ​of​ ​information​ ​between​ ​potential​ ​customers​ ​and​ ​a​ ​car​ ​dealership​ ​through​ ​the​ ​activity​ ​ledger,​ ​including 
REQUEST​ ​activities​ ​representing​ ​customer​ ​searches​ ​and​ ​OFFER​ ​activities​ ​representing​ ​targeted​ ​ads​ ​from​ ​the​ ​dealership. 

 

Customer​ ​and​ ​Retailer​ ​Anonymity​ ​In​ ​the​ ​Activity​ ​Ledger 
As mentioned above, certain aspects of customer and retailer information stored in the BASE activity ledger                               
can be anonymized to protect customers’ identities, information they consider sensitive, and their overall                           
search history. We first describe the possibilities, roles, and challenges associated with anonymous activities,                           
and​ ​further​ ​technical​ ​details​ ​will​ ​be​ ​provided​ ​in​ ​a​ ​later​ ​section. 

At a high level, anonymity can be achieved by allowing a single user to post to the BASE activity ledger using                                         
a variety of unrelated pseudonyms, or alternate identities. We note that the use of multiple identities is                                 
already supported in many blockchain platforms, as any customer can create an arbitrary number of                             
accounts, wallets, or public key identifiers; this is already common in cryptocurrency platforms like Bitcoin.                             
There are several reasons, beyond privacy, that a user may want to do this. For example, suppose that a user                                       
uses BASE while shopping for business needs and also for personal needs. If both of these tasks are                                   
performed using the same identity, as is typically done today through monolithic ad networks, both of these                                 
roles are combined into a single “customer profile”, so the user will be shown ads that relate to both their                                       
business and personal lives. If however, a user could create two separate personas, based on different                               
pseudonymous identities, the search activities could be effectively isolated from each other, allowing the                           
user to separate the ads they see based on their current role. While the different pseudonyms approach                                 
solves customer concerns with regards to anonymization, it introduces a challenge for businesses as now                             
they need to have a way to know that two different pseudonyms asking for a service actually belong to the                                       
same person, to prevent paying out a reward twice. Solution to this problem is described later in the                                   
document. 

In a more general sense, user-facing software can support the use of multiple pseudonyms for a user’s                                 
search activities, either in support of multiple personas as above, or to truly anonymize the user’s search with                                   
a different pseudonym for each activity contributed to the ledger. Even in this case, BASE supports the ability                                   
to later allow the user to selectively reveal information about these anonymous posts. Specifically, metadata                             
can be included in the activity’s fields that can later be used to reveal the true identity of the user or to reveal                                             
links between different pseudonyms (even without exposing the user’s true identity), noting that both of                             
these can be allowed selectively to only a specific list of authorized parties. More technical details about how                                   
these anonymization and selective linking capabilities are provided in a later section. The following example                             
highlights​ ​a​ ​few​ ​key​ ​details​ ​of​ ​identification​ ​and​ ​tracking,​ ​both​ ​of​ ​which​ ​BASE​ ​aims​ ​to​ ​prevent​ ​by​ ​default. 

 

Example:​ ​Linking​ ​a​ ​sequence​ ​of​ ​activities​ ​for​ ​multiple​ ​retailers 
We provide an example scenario to highlight the benefits that can be attained by de-anonymizing or linking                                 
anonymized activities in the ledger. Suppose a person is involved in a serious car accident, and as a result,                                     
they need to find a lawyer, a new car insurance provider, a chiropractor, and an auto repair garage. The user                                       
turns to BASE to search for relevant service providers. For each of their searches, the user publishes a                                   
REQUEST activity to the ledger, each using a different pseudonym instead of their true identity. However,                               
many of these providers may offer better rates for their respective services if they know about the other                                   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 21 

 



 

 

 

services the customer is seeking. For example, subscribing to a car insurance provider may lead to                               
discounted auto repair. More importantly, if a service provider can link together the many activities to                               
understand the unique situation that the user is faced with (in this case, trying to quickly recover from the car                                       
accident), they can be more confident that an OFFER they make to the user will convert into a sale. Because                                       
of this confidence in a strong lead and expected sale, the provider may even choose to make a stronger                                     
OFFER​ ​to​ ​the​ ​user​ ​based​ ​on​ ​the​ ​shared​ ​linking​ ​among​ ​the​ ​activities. 

 

Consumer​ ​Activity​ ​Token​ ​(CAT) 
On top of this distributed activity data collection system, BitClave is introducing a token, called the BitClave                                 
Consumer Activity Token (CAT), to be used internally within the BASE ecosystem among the participating                             
parties. CAT tokens will be used to facilitate rewards within the system for a variety of services available in                                     
BASE. The CAT-based market puts power into the hands of businesses and consumers, instead of focusing                               
power on large advertising companies that collect and profit from customer data surreptitiously. Customers                           
and retailers can interact directly through transparent and consumer-authorized message posts and data                         
bundles on the public blockchain, and additional parties can contribute as service providers by creating                             
software​ ​capabilities​ ​such​ ​as​ ​data​ ​analytics​ ​that​ ​operate​ ​over​ ​the​ ​data​ ​contributed​ ​to​ ​the​ ​blockchain. 

 

BASE solves a real problem for businesses and consumers. Businesses and customers are the main                             
participants as they get most benefit in BASE. Other than business and consumers, in BASE there is a place                                     
for many other participants in roles of service providers, like Search Services, Ranking Services, Analytic                             
Services that will benefit from BASE economics. The following section describes in more details the incentive                               
each​ ​participant​ ​gets​ ​from​ ​being​ ​an​ ​active​ ​part​ ​of​ ​BASE​ ​ecosystem 

 

Tokens​ ​as​ ​Incentive​ ​for​ ​Participation 
As the basis for supporting interactions in the BASE ecosystem, the data contributed to the activity ledger is                                   
of key importance. As such, any activity contributed to the ledger has potential value to BASE as a retail                                     
marketplace. Whether user-contributed REQUEST data leads to direct CAT rewards, however, depends on                         
whether a retailer chooses to respond with an OFFER to that user, which further depends on other                                 
REQUESTs that have been posted by other users’ searches. Because of the open nature of BASE, there is a                                     
natural notion of competition for these CAT rewards. For example, suppose two users X and Y post                                 
REQUESTs for the same product, but Y provides more supporting personal information in their REQUEST.                             
Since​ ​more​ ​information​ ​likely​ ​implies​ ​stronger​ ​seller​ ​confidence​ ​that​ ​an​ ​OFFER​ ​will​ ​convert​ ​into​ ​a​ ​sale,​ ​a 

seller may prefer to send an OFFER to Y rather than X, or they may send a more valuable OFFER to Y than to                                               
X. In this case, while neither shopper is directly paid for their data, Y has made a conscious decision to reveal                                         
more information to make their search more attractive to retailers and therefore more likely to succeed. In                                 
this way, BASE more directly represents a free market economy, as the relative value of contributing                               
different types of activity data to the ledger are determined indirectly by the market economics of the                                 
system. 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 22 

 



 

 

 

 

Retail​ ​Analytics​ ​Providers 
The unique nature of the BASE market creates opportunities for additional roles beyond buyer and seller.                               
Since the REQUEST and OFFER activities likely rely on some understanding of the various customers and                               
retailers, an entity can participate in BASE in the role of an ​analytics provider​. In this role, an entity can create                                         
and sell custom analytics capabilities to various users in BASE, effectively extending the market to include                               
supporting services as well as commercial goods and services. This makes BASE a natural supplement to                               
any eCommerce company’s marketing or customer relationship technology stack. As such, any eCommerce                         
merchant who wants to know a particular feature of their customer base can create a smart contract with an                                     
analytics provider to create the desired functionality. While the ecosystem does not explicitly support                           
contracting and bidding processes, any developer or organization could create this possibility by introducing                           
new​ ​activity​ ​types​ ​and​ ​associated​ ​mechanisms​ ​for​ ​bidding​ ​and​ ​negotiation. 

   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 23 

 



 

 

 

Technical ​ ​Solution​ ​Details 
Main​ ​BASE​ ​components 
 

 

Figure​ ​7:​ ​The​ ​various​ ​components​ ​of​ ​BASE​ ​that​ ​comprise​ ​the​ ​activity​ ​ledger​ ​are​ ​built​ ​on​ ​the​ ​foundations​ ​of​ ​blockchain,​ ​off-chain 
storage,​ ​and​ ​secure​ ​communication​ ​capabilities​ ​among​ ​relevant​ ​parties.​ ​The​ ​BASE​ ​API​ ​provides​ ​a​ ​layer​ ​of​ ​abstraction​ ​to​ ​ease 

development​ ​efforts​ ​and​ ​support​ ​a​ ​level​ ​of​ ​flexibility​ ​regarding​ ​specific​ ​blockchain​ ​implementations. 

 

 

Registration​ ​subsystem 
Interaction with BASE starts with the registration process. Every participant in BASE will have to go through                                 
this process. Since BASE is a decentralized system, we need to have schemes to prevent malicious users                                 
from taking advantage of the system. The basic scenarios we want to prevent are for users to report fake                                     
personal information to businesses to get better OFFERs or for users to open multiple accounts and receive                                 
rewards​ ​for​ ​searches​ ​multiple​ ​times.​ ​These​ ​are​ ​just​ ​a​ ​few​ ​rogue​ ​schemes​ ​to​ ​emphasize​ ​the​ ​challenge. 

The Registration Service is responsible for verifying customer/business information wherever possible.                     
Registration Service is a registered entity in BASE by itself. Registration Service will be identified by its public                                   
key, so every interested participant will be able to verify the authenticity of the information signed by the                                   
Registration Service, but only Registration Service will be able to create such a signature. It is up to a user to                                         
decide which Registration Service to use and what information to disclose for verification. BitClave will                             
implement a Registration Service but other interested parties could implement an alternative version if                           
desired. 

Once a user registers within BASE, the Registration Service, ​after the user’s consent​, will verify the provided                                 
personal information (or parts of personal information) that the selected Registration Service is able to verify.                               
The verified personal information will be signed by Registration Service and will have “higher” value when is                                 
used by businesses to provide OFFERs. For example if the salary information and the current cars of the                                   
users are verified, it will give more confidence to a car dealer when generating a personalized offer. Users                                   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 24 

 



 

 

 

can always opt to verify personal information later, once more comfort with the system is established. After                                 
registration is complete, the personal information of the user will be stored in blockchain in an encrypted                                 
way. No one will be able to understand it, but the user will be able to provide a key to the parties based on                                               
choice, so these parties can decrypt the personal information and also check if the information is signed and                                   
verified​ ​by​ ​one​ ​of​ ​the​ ​Registration​ ​Services. 

 

REQUEST​ ​Subsystem 
When customers interact with BASE, they mainly interact with the REQUEST subsystem. Here, customers can                             
submit searches as REQUEST activities, receive a list of OFFERs, interact with OFFERs to receive rewards for                                 
viewing,​ ​and​ ​complete​ ​sales​ ​transactions. 

The REQUEST subsystem represents customer interests. In decentralized systems we have multiple entities                         
for search and multiple businesses responding to customer REQUESTs. These entities pursue their interests                           
or​ ​could​ ​be​ ​just​ ​malicious​ ​entities.​ ​The​ ​main​ ​role​ ​of​ ​REQUEST 

subsystem is to protect customer interest and maximize BASE value to customer. Some of the most                               
important​ ​roles​ ​of​ ​REQUEST​ ​subsystem​ ​include: 

 

● Filter out spam or OFFERs that do not satisfy customer REQUEST. This could happen by mistake or                                 
intentionally​ ​when​ ​posted​ ​by​ ​some​ ​malicious​ ​sender. 

● Filter out not-trustworthy businesses, for example business with low ranking or businesses with not                           
confirmed​ ​registration​ ​status. 

● Prioritize search results from multiple search engines based on criteria customer selects. While this                           
prioritization could be implemented in customer UI layer, implementation in contract layer would be                           
visible​ ​to​ ​other​ ​entities​ ​and​ ​will​ ​further​ ​improve​ ​business​ ​ability​ ​to​ ​provide​ ​the​ ​best​ ​matching​ ​offer. 

● Collect relevant personal information as part of REQUEST process. For example, while looking for                           
car insurance, the system might ask for a more detailed questions like current house insurance,                             
previous car insurance or life insurance. While these questions would be of a concern to answer in                                 
initial registration phase, a customer will be more comfortable to provide these in context of                             
insurance search query. Of course, customer can decide not to provide this information and he                             
would still receive offers but these might be not as good as offers based on a more detailed                                   
personal information. Once additional personal information will be provided as part of the search it                             
will be securely stored with customer account on blockchain in an encrypted way and later could                               
be​ ​used,​ ​with​ ​customer​ ​consent,​ ​in​ ​other​ ​REQUESTs. 

● Recommend customer what private information to reveal to get a better OFFER. Usually, OFFER will                             
include different reward based on customer personal information (that's the the whole point of                           
targeted/personalized offer). When REQUEST subsystem is receiving an offer, it can identify what                         
personal information would result in a better reward for the customer and would recommend to                             
customer to expose that information to the offer. Customer then will make decision to expose or                               

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 25 

 



 

 

 

not,​ ​based​ ​on​ ​additional​ ​reward,​ ​level​ ​of​ ​trust​ ​to​ ​the​ ​proposing​ ​business​ ​and​ ​other​ ​criteria. 

● Interact with R&A service to assist customer in selection best anonymization approach for his                           
REQUESTs. We discuss below various approaches for anonymization, so here Request subsystem,                       
representing customer interest, would recommend the most suitable approach for a specific                       
transaction 

 

OFFER​ ​Subsystem 
When businesses interacts with BASE, they mainly interact with the OFFER subsystem. Business can submit                             
OFFERS to BASE, define OFFER structure based on individual customer information, run data analytics to                             
understand​ ​what​ ​OFFERs​ ​are​ ​working​ ​and​ ​other​ ​related​ ​activities. 

The OFFER subsystem represents business interests and has many similar features to the REQUEST system                             
above,​ ​only​ ​on​ ​the​ ​business-facing​ ​side​ ​rather​ ​than​ ​the​ ​customer-facing​ ​​ ​side.  

The​ ​most​ ​important​ ​roles​ ​of​ ​the​ ​OFFER​ ​subsystem​ ​include: 

 

Identify scammers or not trustworthy customers, as in the REQUEST subsystem but now                         
focusing​ ​on​ ​protecting​ ​business​ ​interests. 

 

Prepare targeted OFFERs based on specific customer personal information, customer                   
ranking and customer search request. This is very similar to the roles of REQUEST                           
subsystem​ ​but​ ​in​ ​the​ ​“reverse”​ ​direction​ ​and​ ​with​ ​focus​ ​on​ ​protecting​ ​business​ ​interests. 

 

 

Verify “proof-of-view” reports before sending to customer reward for viewing the offer.                       
Click fraud is major issue with online advertisement. While addressing customer privacy                       
concerns by anonymization schemes, we need to address key business concern of how                         
BASE would prevent click frauds by scripts or malicious users. Quite a few solutions are                             
available on market today, and BitClave is going to pick a combination of proprietary and                             
off-the-shelf​ ​solutions​ ​for​ ​protection​ ​of​ ​business. 

 

Search​ ​Service 
Search Service is an independent entity that is matching REQUESTs with OFFERs. Search Service incentive                             
is to maximize the number of transactions in BASE. Search Service could be optionally incentivized by CATs                                 
for successful transaction. A variety of different Search Services could be employed in BASE, with some                               
trying to optimize the customer experience and others trying to maximize business value. We do not want to                                   
impose any strict constraints on the Search Service, rather allowing for competition in the ecosystem, while                               

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 26 

 



 

 

 

customer​ ​and​ ​business​ ​interests​ ​will​ ​be​ ​protected​ ​by​ ​REQUEST​ ​and​ ​OFFER​ ​subsystems​ ​respectively. 

Search Services can be very specialized, focusing on local services like plumbers, babysitters, school tutors,                             
cars, lawyers, financial advisors and more. BASE is designed to support multiple implementations for any                             
service​ ​in​ ​the​ ​system. 

 

 

 

 

Figure​ ​8:​ ​The​ ​BASE​ ​architecture​ ​shows​ ​how​ ​the​ ​various​ ​services​ ​play​ ​interactive​ ​roles​ ​between​ ​customers,​ ​businesses,​ ​and​ ​the 
blockchain-based​ ​ledger. 

 

As mentioned above, the role of the Search Service in BASE is to provide a “recommendation” to REQUEST                                   
or​ ​​ ​OFFER​ ​smart​ ​contracts​ ​on​ ​potential​ ​matches.​ ​The​ ​final​ ​decision​ ​to​ ​make​ ​a 

business transaction is made by the user and is facilitated by smart contracts on-chain. The role of the                                   
Search Service can be compared to the role of a realtor in the real-estate business. The realtor will bring                                     
together a potential buyer and seller, but the final decision on business transaction is made by the                                 
individuals. 

Here are some details about BASE Search Service Implementation. To implement BASE, BitClave assumes                           
two​ ​roles: 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 27 

 



 

 

 

 

One role is to implement an open, decentralized platform that enables direct                       
customer-to-business interaction with no need for intermediaries as in third-party                   
advertising​ ​networks.  

 

The other is to implement all applications and services required to bring this platform to                             
users.​ ​These​ ​include​ ​the​ ​Search​ ​Engine,​ ​Clients,​ ​Business​ ​apps,​ ​and​ ​more. 

Remember, BitClave’s goal is to build a platform with no intermediaries. It means BitClave is committed to                                 
define an open platform, hence its implementation will use only information that is available to all. ​This                                 
transparency guarantees BitClave itself is not playing the same role as the middlemen in advertising. In                               
addition, BitClave will provide its implementations for Search and other components as open source                           
software. 

BitClave, in the first capacity, will store anonymized information about customers, businesses, offered                         
product/and services in a combination of on-chain storage and off-chain open, decentralized storage                         
available​ ​to​ ​all. 

In its second role, BitClave will use off-chain entities to enable efficient search. These entities will include                                 
external servers that will retrieve information from open storage (in a read-only way) and will populate                               
BitClave’s databases that are optimized for search. When new search requests enter the blockchain, BASE                             
will use its database to find the matching offers and will communicate these offers to the smart contracts on                                     
blockchain. The final decision to make the transaction is done by the user and is facilitated by smart                                   
contracts.​ ​Recall​ ​from​ ​above,​ ​the​ ​Search​ ​Service​ ​is​ ​just​ ​providing​ ​recommendations. 

We note that nothing prevents any other interested party to implement a more efficient blockchain-based                             
Search Service. Thanks to its open-source nature, BASE will only benefit from alternative and better                             
implementations of Search Services, and with continued engagement from BitClave’s users and partners,                         
along with advances in blockchain technology, the recommendation engine will improve and enhance the                           
performance​ ​of​ ​the​ ​entire​ ​ecosystem 

 

Ranking​ ​&​ ​Anonymization​ ​Services 
Ranking in a distributed and anonymized system is a challenging subject. On one side, customers may want                                 
to be anonymous, so they may use different pseudonyms for different activities in BASE. On the other side,                                   
businesses​ ​want​ ​to​ ​provide​ ​OFFERs​ ​to​ ​customers​ ​whose 

interests are more relevant, but in order to build a ranking, one needs to correlate activities (including                                 
searches, purchases, and profile details) across multiple different customer pseudonyms. To discuss our                         
approach, we use a variety of terminology related to identity, anonymity, pseudonyms, and linkability that are                               
consistent with the Common Criteria ISO/IEC 15408 standard for Information Technology Security Evaluation                       

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 28 

 



 

 

 

. 
6

At a high level, to maintain openness in the BASE ecosystem, we plan to create various options for users to                                       
select, so they have control over their own tradeoffs between anonymity and search value. We next describe                                 
how we intend to address the conflict between customer desires for anonymity and businesses need for                               
linkability. 

 

Ranking​ ​by​ ​Customer​ ​ID 
At one end of the tradeoff, a customer can sacrifice anonymity completely by using their primary blockchain                                 
wallet identity in all of their BASE transactions. In this simplest mode, all of the customer’s information                                 
(whether public or protected) is linked to their true identity in the ledger, so any other party can perform a                                       
variety of analytics of the customer’s search and purchasing history, for example computing the ratio of                               
purchases to offers (i.e., their conversion rate). The disadvantage for customers in this mode is that all                                 
historical transaction activities can be linked together. While some customers may choose this approach that                             
maximizes search value (while still protecting individual transaction details, of course), others would be                           
uncomfortable​ ​releasing​ ​this​ ​much​ ​information​ ​about​ ​their​ ​transaction​ ​history. 

Even with complete linkability, we want to protect the customer data involved in individual transactions and                               
enable​ ​selectively​ ​revealing​ ​information​ ​to​ ​businesses.​ ​To​ ​realize​ ​this  

ability, we could include a list of encrypted customer data, along with the search query, where each list item                                     
is encrypted using a symmetric key that nobody else knows. This is an example of what is called a                                     
cryptographic commitment, because it doesn’t reveal any of the information, but binds each piece of                             
information​ ​to​ ​the​ ​search.​ ​For​ ​example,​ ​this​ ​list​ ​could​ ​contain​ ​values​ ​like 

E​k1​(info ​1​),​ ​E ​k2​(info ​2​),​ ​… ​ ​, ​ ​E​kn​(info​n​), 

where E​k ​denotes encryption with a symmetric key k and each piece of information ​info​i ​is encrypted using a                                     
different key k​i​. If the customer later wants to reveal a specific piece of information ​info​i ​to a retailer, such as                                         
his purchasing history or some demographic details, the corresponding key ​k​i ​can be securely                           
communicated to the business, allowing them to decrypt the relevant data. As an example of how this would                                   
be transmitted, the customer could, for example, send the encrypted message ​E​PKj​(k​i​) to business j, where                               
E​PKj ​denotes asymmetric encryption using the business’s public key ​PK​j​. This action (referred to as opening                               
the commitment) allows the retailer to access the customer’s private information without changing any past                             
commitment,​ ​since​ ​the​ ​blockchain​ ​prevents​ ​modifying​ ​past​ ​data. 

6 ​ ​​Common ​ ​Criteria ​ ​for​ ​Information ​ ​Technology ​ ​Security ​ ​Evaluation,​ ​Part​ ​3:​ ​Security ​ ​Assurance ​ ​Components,​ ​v.​ ​3.1,​ ​rev.​ ​4, 
Sep. ​ ​2012, ​ ​Available ​ ​​https://www.commoncriteriaportal.org/files/ccfiles/ccpart3v3.1r4.pd 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 29 

 

https://www.commoncriteriaportal.org/files/ccfiles/ccpart3v3.1r4.pdf


 

 

 

Ranking​ ​by​ ​Pseudonyms​ ​Initiated​ ​by​ ​the​ ​Customer 
In​ ​a​ ​step​ ​toward​ ​stronger​ ​anonymity,​ ​the​ ​customer​ ​can​ ​choose​ ​to​ ​use​ ​pseudonyms​ ​for​ ​different​ ​activities​ ​in  

BASE, so the activities cannot be linked together. While this protects the customer’s search history, it hides                                 
useful information from businesses. In some cases, the customer may want to reveal certain links to a                                 
business, for example to facilitate many of the use cases described previously. This could be useful to prove                                   
that a customer purchased a new car and now is looking for insurance or to demonstrate repeat business,                                   
such as buying running shoes every few months. Ideally, the customer can expose certain links to selected                                 
businesses without (i) revealing ALL transaction history or (ii) revealing links to undesired businesses.                           
Whether a customer exposes links will also depend on whether a business will actually provide added value                                 
to the customer for the information, as the businesses are not paying for the data directly, but that is a                                       
different​ ​concern. 

To understand how we could implement this selective linkability feature in BASE, recall that the strictest use                                 
of pseudonyms would mean that every activity posted in the ledger would appear to come from a unique                                   
person, meaning true customer identity is perfectly obscured. In a slightly more practical approach, suppose                             
a customer uses different pseudonyms for different search activities, for example using one pseudonym                           
ID​shoes ​to search for new running shoes every few months. However, now suppose this customer wants to                                 
reveal some information from their public profile, which requires linking the pseudonym ​ID​shoes ​with the                             
customer’s real identity ​ID​real ​corresponding to the profile. There are many ways to do this, starting with the                                   
previous example where pieces of information can be encrypted and committed to the search. In particular,                               
when searching using pseudonym ​ID​shoes​, the customer can include an encrypted tag ​E​k​(sig​SKreal​(k))​, which is                             
an encrypted signature using the secret key ​SK​real ​corresponding to the true identity ​ID​real​. This encrypted tag                                 
is meaningless without the key k, as the encrypted signature can be neither accessed nor validated without                                 
it. As in the previous case, the customer can securely reveal the key ​k to a selected business, which then                                       
allows the business to unlock the signature ​sig​SKreal​(k) and verify that it was signed with the correct secret key                                     
to prove the link between the pseudonym and real identity. Similarly, if customer wants to link together                                 
multiple pseudonyms (for example, if the customer did each search for shoes using a different pseudonym),                               
a list of transactions and the corresponding keys can be shared to link them together, all without anyone                                   
else knowing this linking exists. Moreover, the linking could be done entirely among pseudonyms, without                             
linking to the customer’s true identity, if all that is needed is a proof that the searches were all made by the                                           
same​ ​customer. 

However, with this type of exchange using pseudonyms instead of true identities, it’s probably the case that                                 
an identity is more sensitive than other types of information, so we may want to provide even stronger                                   
guarantees. In fact, using an encrypted signature as above has a potential weakness that it is not bound to                                     
the pseudonym, just the real identity. Instead of committing the identity using symmetric encryption as we                               
may do with other customer information, we can build a stronger cryptographic commitment that binds                             
to both the pseudonym and the real identity in a verified way. Instead, we can construct a signature pair that                                       
uses both asymmetric private/secret keys ​SK​shoes ​and ​SK​real ​to prove the customer holds both identities. One                               
possible​ ​way​ ​to​ ​do​ ​this​ ​would​ ​be​ ​to​ ​include​ ​the​ ​signature​ ​pair 

S ​ ​=​ ​[sig​SKshoes​(k),​ ​sig​SKreal​(k)] 

inside the search when using the pseudonym ​ID​shoes​, using a similar random value k as the input to the                                     
signature function for each secret key. When the customer later wants to prove to another party that he                                   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 30 

 



 

 

 

controls both ​ID​shoes ​and ​ID​real​, he can secretly share the value ​k corresponding to that specific search, and                                   
the​ ​other​ ​party​ ​can​ ​validate​ ​both​ ​signatures​ ​in​ ​​S​​ ​​ ​using​ ​customer’s​ ​two​ ​public​ ​keys​ ​​PK​shoes​​ ​​ ​​and​ ​​PK​real​. 

 

Third-Party​ ​Ranking​ ​&​ ​Anonymization​ ​Service 
Another approach to balance the conflict between ranking and anonymization is to leverage an additional                             
service provider in the ecosystem. This Ranking & Anonymization (R&A) Service effectively combines the                           
benefits of the above approaches and facilitates privacy- and anonymity-preserving transactions between                       
customers and businesses. Using the R&A Service, a customer will post an encrypted transaction to the R&A                                 
Service, which will post the transaction on behalf of the customer, while making a private record of the                                   
customer identity. R&A Service will see all transactions from the customer and hence will be able to compute                                   
the true global ranking for the customer. R&A Service will post transactions using new pseudonyms each                               
time and will attach the true customer ranking as part of the transactions. The specific implementation of the                                   
R&A​ ​Service​ ​is​ ​a​ ​combination​ ​of​ ​the​ ​above​ ​techniques,​ ​though​ ​with​ ​the​ ​assistance​ ​of​ ​a​ ​third-party​ ​service. 

From the business point of view, when a transaction goes through an R&A Service, it is more trustworthy.                                   
The incentive for customers to use this mode is that it will provide higher confidence for businesses in                                   
comparison to working with anonymous customers. Customers can decide which R&A Service to use, if any.                               
The incentive for R&A service would be to provide “useful” ranking capabilities, and it could charge CAT fees                                   
for​ ​its​ ​services. 

To summarize, customers and businesses have many alternatives in controlling their private information and                           
their respective activity histories. As such, they will decide what works best for them. Since BASE is an open                                     
and competitive marketplace, it will eventually reach an equilibrium point, where the level of anonymization,                             
trust,​ ​and​ ​reward​ ​is​ ​optimized​ ​for​ ​the​ ​community. 

 

Activity​ ​Analytics 
As discussed, the main value of the anonymized activity ledger is the ability to share anonymized customer                                 
and retailer data to facilitate analytics that provide value to customers and retailers in the ecosystem. The                                 
Analytics subsystem is tightly related to R&A subsystem. It needs to interact with customers and businesses                               
through the ledger to correlate transactions, but its goal is to provide a more global view to interested                                   
parties​ ​so​ ​these​ ​could​ ​optimize​ ​their​ ​strategies.  

Specific​ ​examples​ ​include: 

● Access to certain details of a BUY activity can be used to analyze purchasing trends, identify items                                 
in high demand, or expose similar patterns. Again, rather than publishing such details publicly,                           
access can be controlled cryptographically using suitable key management, encrypted search, or                       
other​ ​techniques. 

● Analysis of customer profiles, personalized OFFERs and BUY / no BUY activities would allow                           
businesses to develop a winning strategies with regards to rewards to be offered to a certain                               

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 31 

 



 

 

 

customers. 

● In addition to activity analytics for the purpose of opportunity identification and prediction, parties                           
can use the data from the activity ledger to verify claims (analogous to forensic evidence), for                               
example​ ​to​ ​satisfy​ ​the​ ​conditions​ ​of​ ​a​ ​smart​ ​contract​ ​made​ ​with​ ​another​ ​party​ ​in​ ​the​ ​ecosystem. 

 

 

Figure​ ​9:​ ​Analytics​ ​play​ ​an​ ​important​ ​role​ ​in​ ​BASE,​ ​providing​ ​insight​ ​to​ ​both​ ​customers​ ​and​ ​businesses​ ​in​ ​regard​ ​to​ ​histories​ ​of​ ​their 
respective​ ​activities​ ​in​ ​the​ ​marketplace. 

 

The capabilities of the Analytics subsystem vary depending on the level of anonymization that customers                             
and businesses use. To illustrate the variations, we provide a few representative examples of analytic                             
strength​ ​as​ ​a​ ​function​ ​of​ ​anonymity​ ​level. 

 

Case​ ​1​ ​(anonymity) 
If a customer posts all of their searches using unique pseudonyms, corresponding to the strongest level of                                 
anonymity, it is impossible to compute any sort of search history, as each identity is used only once. In this                                       
case, the only way for a business to learn anything about the customer’s search or purchasing history is to                                     
ask them to reveal more information, potentially relying on a smart contract that provides some added value                                 
to​ ​the​ ​customer. 

 

Case​ ​2​ ​(linkability) 
If a customer is willing to reveal links between their relevant past purchases but not willing to reveal their                                     

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 32 

 



 

 

 

identity or personal profile information, the analytics provider will be able to match the customer’s purchase                               
history to a particular predictive model that will suggest what other goods and services the customer may be                                   
interested in. For example, if the customer has linked activities for car repair services and personal injury                                 
lawyer services, the analytics provider may suggest promotions for car insurance or medical services, even                             
without​ ​knowing​ ​the​ ​customer​ ​or​ ​any​ ​of​ ​their​ ​demographic​ ​information. 

 

Case​ ​3​ ​(personal​ ​profiling) 
If in addition to linkability, the customer is willing to reveal some amount of personal information from their                                   
profile, the analytics service can further improve the quality or value of the promotions suggested for the                                 
customer, providing stronger matches between the customer and potential service providers or better                         
discounts​ ​in​ ​the​ ​promotions. 

Based on the inherent value of analytics in marketing platforms, BitClave is planning to integrate with open                                 
source or commercial analytics platforms. The fact that BitClave maintains the read-only snapshot of the                             
activity ledger significantly eases the integration with available solutions. This is a similar benefit of external                               
snapshot as we see with BitClave Search approach. We note however, that the analytics subsystem is one of                                   
the advanced services envisioned for BASE, so it will be provided by BitClave at a later stage of                                   
development. As BASE is an open platform, other vendors could implement alternative competing Analytics                           
services. 

 

BASE​ ​Scalability​ ​and​ ​BASE​ ​NODE​ ​API 
The vision for BASE is a fully decentralized, blockchain-based search platform where users and businesses                             
can connect directly. This means utilizing enormous amounts of data, from both users and businesses. The                               
pace of innovation in the blockchain domain is extremely high. While current leading blockchains like Bitcoin                               
and Ethereum recognize scalability challenges and work on solutions for their blockchains, new platforms                           
come to life with theoretically improved solutions - EOS , NEO , QTUM ​are just few platforms to offer                                 

7 8 9

improved transaction speed. Innovation happens in many domains, not only scalability - improved                         
anonymization​ ​like​ ​in​ ​ZCASH ​ ​​and  10

MONERO , a more secure contract language like in QTUM, distributed storage systems like Filecoin ​and                             
11 12

SiaCoin , side channel solutions like Raiden Networks ​or recent Plasma ​announcement. To deal with                           
13 14 15

7 ​ ​​​ ​​https://eos.io/ ​ ​​- ​ ​The ​ ​Most ​ ​Powerful​ ​Infrastructure ​ ​for ​ ​Decentralized ​ ​Applications 
8 ​ ​​​ ​​https://neo.org ​ ​​- ​ ​A ​ ​Distributed ​ ​Smart​ ​Economy ​ ​Network 
9 ​ ​​​ ​​https://qtum.org/en/ ​ ​​-​ ​The ​ ​Blockchain ​ ​Made ​ ​Ready​ ​for ​ ​Business 
10 ​ ​​ ​​https://z.cash/ ​ ​​- ​ ​Zcash ​ ​is ​ ​the ​ ​first​ ​open,​ ​permissionless ​ ​cryptocurrency ​ ​that​ ​can ​ ​fully ​ ​protect​ ​the ​ ​privacy ​ ​of​ ​transactions 
using ​ ​zero-knowledge ​ ​cryptography 
11 ​ ​​https://getmonero.org/ ​ ​​- ​ ​Monero ​ ​is ​ ​a ​ ​secure, ​ ​private, ​ ​untraceable ​ ​currency, 
12 ​ ​​https://ipfs.io/ ​ ​​- ​ ​A ​ ​peer-to-peer ​ ​hypermedia ​ ​protocol​ ​to ​ ​make​ ​the​ ​web ​ ​faster,​ ​safer,​ ​and​ ​more ​ ​open 
13 ​ ​​http://sia.tech/ ​ ​​- ​ ​Sia ​ ​splits ​ ​apart, ​ ​encrypts,​ ​and ​ ​distributes ​ ​your ​ ​files ​ ​across​ ​a​ ​decentralized ​ ​network 
14​ ​​http://raiden.network/ ​ ​​- ​ ​High ​ ​speed ​ ​asset ​ ​transfers ​ ​for ​ ​Ethereum 
15 ​ ​​http://plasma.io/ ​ ​​-​ ​Plasma: ​ ​Scalable ​ ​Autonomous ​ ​Smart ​ ​Contracts 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 33 

 

https://eos.io/
https://neo.org/
https://qtum.org/en/
https://z.cash/
https://getmonero.org/
https://ipfs.io/
http://sia.tech/
http://raiden.network/
http://plasma.io/


 

 

 

such a high innovation pace and to be able to leverage the new solutions that become available, BitClave is                                     
introducing a BASE API layer that will abstract the underlying infrastructure services for distributed                           
computing,​ ​communication​ ​and​ ​storage. 

BitClave’s main focus is to develop the BASE platform and the applications and services to bring the platform                                   
to users. This is where BitClave brings value. BitClave is going to ride the innovation wave and leverage new                                     
technologies​ ​as​ ​they​ ​become​ ​available​ ​or​ ​mature.​ ​BASE​ ​NODE​ ​API​ ​will​ ​help​ ​make​ ​this​ ​ride​ ​a​ ​lot​ ​smoother. 

 

Ethereum​ ​Blockchain 
BitClave will use Ethereum as the platform for initial release. Ethereum is a proven blockchain that provides                                 
the services required for BASE. With a strong roadmap, Ethereum’s capability and functionality are improving                             
continuously. Metropolis ​with improved anonymity by zkSNARKS ​and Serenity ​with “Proof of Work” and                           16 17 18

“Proof of Stake” in near feature and Plasma in a more far future are just few examples to show Ethereum is a                                           
very​ ​appealing​ ​platform. 

To illustrate the value each of these Ethereum improvements will bring to BASE, we provide the following                                 
use case of BitClave Search using Ethereum blockchain without any optimizations, followed by how each                             
complementary​ ​technique​ ​would​ ​provide​ ​added​ ​value. 

As a starting point, let's assume that BASE DB is already populated with OFFERs. In step#1, a customer                                   
submits search requests that are written to the blockchain. BitClave Search will detect that a new request                                 
was submitted (step#2). It will then perform the search within BASE DB to find the matching offer (step#3)                                   
and will write the proposed match to blockchain for OFFER contract to consider the proposal. The OFFER will                                   
read​ ​the​ ​new​ ​proposal​ ​(step#4),​ ​perform​ ​internal​ ​verification​ ​of​ ​the​ ​recommendation​ ​to​ ​make​ ​sure 

Search recommendation meets the search requirements, and start communication with the original                       
REQUEST contract (step#5). As part of step #5, OFFER will propose to REQUEST, and REQUEST in turn will                                   
verify that the offer matches the rules (reminder, none of REQUEST / OFFER / SEARCH are trusting each                                   
other). REQUEST will present the offer to user, who may decide to view or not to view the offer, and if the                                           
offer is viewed the proof-of-view has to be submitted back to OFFER to confirm the reward. For simplicity of                                     
the diagram, we combine all these steps in communication between REQUEST and OFFER under one                             
bidirectional​ ​arrow​ ​for​ ​step#5. 

16 ​ ​​V. ​ ​Buterin, ​ ​“Ethereum ​ ​R&D ​ ​Roundup:​ ​Valentine’s ​ ​Day ​ ​Edition”,​ ​Feb ​ ​2017, 
https://blog.ethereum.org/2017/02/14/ethereum-rnd-roundup-valentines-day-edition 
17 ​ ​​C. ​ ​Reitwiessner, ​ ​“zkSNARKs ​ ​in ​ ​a ​ ​nutshell”,​ ​Dec ​ ​2016,​ ​​https://blog.ethereum.org/2016/12/05/zksnarks-in-a-nutshell 
18 ​ ​​V. ​ ​Buterin, ​ ​“Understanding ​ ​Serenity,​ ​Part ​ ​I:​ ​Abstraction”,​ ​Dec​ ​2016, 
https://blog.ethereum.org/2015/12/24/understanding-serenity-part-i-abstraction 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 34 

 

https://blog.ethereum.org/2017/02/14/ethereum-rnd-roundup-valentines-day-edition
https://blog.ethereum.org/2016/12/05/zksnarks-in-a-nutshell
https://blog.ethereum.org/2015/12/24/understanding-serenity-part-i-abstraction


 

 

 

 

 

Figure​ ​10:​ ​The​ ​flow​ ​of​ ​activities​ ​for​ ​a​ ​basis​ ​search​ ​activity​ ​is​ ​illustrated​ ​using​ ​Ethereum. 

 

Storage​ ​Scalability 
Ethereum provides a facility for decentralized storage. Unfortunately, the solution offered today by Ethereum                           
is quite expensive. To store information on that blockchain, one needs to pay 20000 GAS just for a single                                     
instruction to store 32 bytes of data, which is about $0.02 when using average 4gwei for GAS price. When                                     
scaled by the number of transactions expected to go through BASE platform, the GAS fees alone reach                                 
millions​ ​of​ ​dollars. 

Bitclave is looking for a better solution where it can significantly reduce the fees and gain performance.                                 
Multiple solutions are available today and BitClave is researching various technologies. IPFS /Filecoin ,                       19 20

Storj ,​ ​and​ ​SiaCoin ​ ​are​ ​few​ ​technologies​ ​that​ ​the​ ​team​ ​is​ ​currently​ ​evaluating. 21 22

19 ​ ​​https://ipfs.io/ ​ ​​- ​ ​A ​ ​peer-to-peer ​ ​hypermedia ​ ​protocol​ ​to ​ ​make ​ ​the ​ ​web ​ ​faster,​ ​safer,​ ​and​ ​more ​ ​open 
20 ​ ​​​ ​​https://filecoin.io/ ​ ​​-​ ​Filecoin: ​ ​A ​ ​Decentralized ​ ​Storage ​ ​Network 
21 ​https://storj.io/ ​- Blockchain-based, end-to-end encrypted, distributed object storage, where only you have access to                             
your ​ ​data 
22 ​ ​​http://sia.tech/ ​ ​​-​ ​Your​ ​decentralized ​ ​private ​ ​cloud 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 35 

 

https://ipfs.io/
https://filecoin.io/
https://storj.io/
http://sia.tech/


 

 

 

 

 

 

Figure​ ​11:​ ​Using​ ​off-chain​ ​decentralized​ ​storage​ ​along​ ​with​ ​Ethereum​ ​will​ ​provided​ ​the​ ​added​ ​benefit​ ​of​ ​reducing​ ​the​ ​size​ ​of​ ​data 
published​ ​to​ ​Ethereum,​ ​thereby​ ​reducing​ ​GAS​ ​fees​ ​in​ ​exchange​ ​for​ ​communication​ ​with​ ​the​ ​public​ ​storage​ ​system. 

 

To take advantage of “off-chain decentralized storage”, will do the following modifications: when REQUEST                           
writes to the blockchain, now only a single pointer will be written to the blockchain, while the rest of the data                                         
will be written to public external storage. Consequently, BASE search will have to follow pointers from the                                 
blockchain​ ​to​ ​access​ ​full​ ​REQUEST​ ​details​ ​from​ ​external​ ​storage.​ ​OFFERs​ ​will​ ​also​ ​follow​ ​the​ ​similar​ ​scheme. 

 

Transaction​ ​Speed 
Transaction speed on Ethereum is on the order of tens per second (see the recent CoinTelegraph                               
announcement ​for more accurate numbers). With more and more DAPPs to be deployed on Ethereum in                               23

the​ ​near​ ​future​ ​and​ ​with​ ​a​ ​large​ ​amount​ ​of​ ​transactions​ ​to​ ​happen​ ​on​ ​BASE,​ ​transaction​ ​speed​ ​might  

 

23 ​W. Suberg, “Ethereum Breaks Blockchain Transaction Record, Price Steady”, The CoinTelegraph, Aug 2017,                           
https://cointelegraph.com/news/ethereum-breaks-blockchain-transaction-record-price-steady​. 
 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 36 

 

https://cointelegraph.com/news/ethereum-breaks-blockchain-transaction-record-price-steady


 

 

 

become an issue. To mitigate this risk, BitClave could deploy secure P2P channels, using technologies                             
similar​ ​to​ ​technologies​ ​used​ ​by​ ​Raiden​ ​Network ​ ​​or​ ​Bitcoin​ ​Lightning . 24 25

 

 

Figure​ ​12:​ ​Direct​ ​P2P​ ​secure​ ​communication​ ​can​ ​be​ ​used​ ​to​ ​further​ ​offload​ ​some​ ​of​ ​the​ ​BASE​ ​interactions​ ​from​ ​the​ ​blockchain, 
improving​ ​performance​ ​and​ ​speed​ ​due​ ​to​ ​limitations​ ​of​ ​Ethereum. 

 

As seen in the description of step#4, all communication is between REQUEST and OFFER, and the rest of the                                     
blockchain does not care about the details of this negotiation. What is important is whether the transaction                                 
happened or not, so we can use a direct “state channel” for step#5 and write only the final result to the                                         
blockchain. Furthermore, in case an OFFER is from a business that a customer is making continual                               
purchases, the state can be stored off-chain for a longer period of time, until one of the parties decides to                                       
post the state to blockchain for global visibility. In this scenario, even more transactions are offloaded from                                 
the​ ​main​ ​blockchain. 

 

Legal 
BitClave is incorporated in Singapore as BitClave Pte. Ltd. and is headquartered and operated from                             
California, USA as BitClave Inc. The BitClave headquarters, it’s founders, and a significant portion of                             

24 ​ ​​http://raiden.network/ ​ ​​- ​ ​High ​ ​speed ​ ​asset ​ ​transfers ​ ​for ​ ​Ethereum 
25 ​ ​​https://lightning.network/ ​ ​​- ​ ​Scalable,​ ​Instant ​ ​Bitcoin/Blockchain ​ ​Transactions 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 37 

 

http://raiden.network/
https://lightning.network/


 

 

 

development team are located in the USA where all federal, state, and local laws are obeyed and                                 
compliance enforced. To ensure legal compliance throughout the BitClave project and company structure,                         
BitClave​ ​is​ ​working​ ​with​ ​leading​ ​law​ ​firms​ ​like​ ​Schiff​ ​Hardin​ ​and​ ​Cooley.  
 
Additionally, we have added several key blockchain advisors including Guy Benartzi of Bancor, Chris Miess                             
of TenX, Sten Laureyssens of Gambit Capital, and Min Kim of ICON, that are actively helping us implement                                   
industry best practices regarding the proper legal structure of ICOs in addition to advising on important                               
business​ ​and​ ​technology​ ​related​ ​aspects​ ​of​ ​running​ ​a​ ​successful​ ​blockchain​ ​startup​ ​and​ ​building​ ​BASE. 
 

Deployment ​ ​Plan 
Combining the above components, the BitClave Activity Search Ecosystem acts as a platform for creating                             
customer-driven and incentivized retail opportunity. As the platform provider, BitClave’s primary focus is to                           
establish the core framework of the ecosystem, upon which all developers can create apps and services. In                                 
one sense, the BitClave platform is to the retail ecosystem what Facebook is to social networking. As such,                                   
BitClave’s core offerings to support the B2C ecosystem (as well as B2B support services) will include a core                                   
application (browser and app based) and a collection of APIs, libraries, and SDKs that will allow external                                 
developers to build on top of the platform (analogous to the Facebook Graph API). In another sense, given                                   
an open platform with no established intermediary, BitClave offers similar services and derives revenue in                             
the same way as any third-party developer within the ecosystem. BitClave apps benefit from first-mover                             
advantage as well as tight integration with service providers across the ecosystem but in a decentralized                               
platform​ ​it​ ​is​ ​plausible​ ​and​ ​well​ ​rewarded​ ​for​ ​developers​ ​and​ ​service​ ​providers​ ​to​ ​“out​ ​BitClave”​ ​BitClave. 

BitClave is also excited to announce a partnership with QTUM. Qtum is a hybrid blockchain application                               
platform. Qtum’s core technology combines the advantages of bitcoin core, an Account Abstraction Layer                           
allowing for multiple Virtual Machines including the Ethereum Virtual Machine (EVM) and Proof-of-Stake                         
consensus aimed at tackling industry use cases. What makes Qtum a viable option for enterprise-level                             
blockchain applications, like BitClave’s Active Search Ecosystem (BASE), is the ability to use Proof of Stake                               
as a consensus mechanism. The more the network is used, the higher the volume of transactions, the more                                   
energy required to achieve true consensus. Proof of Stake gives an opportunity to build blockchain solutions                               
capable of handling a higher transaction throughput, ideal for businesses and high-activity ecosystems like                           
BASE 

Initial​ ​Development​ ​Efforts 
The initial design of the platform will be based on the REQUEST and OFFER activities described previously.                                 
We envision a mobile app (as the user’s primary AP) with a “search engine” interface that allows users to                                     
create REQUEST activities by initiating a search request for a particular service or product. Retailers and                               
service providers who can fulfill the user’s interest request can submit OFFERs to the customer, with an                                 
appropriate payment incentive for them to view and/or respond to the OFFER. We’ll also implement VIEW                               
activity​ ​to​ ​support​ ​“Proof​ ​of​ ​View”​ ​and​ ​CAT​ ​transfer​ ​from​ ​business​ ​to​ ​customer​ ​for​ ​viewing​ ​the​ ​OFFER. 

We will then gradually include further activity creation capabilities into the mobile app such as browsing an                                 
online​ ​retailer​ ​and​ ​initiating​ ​purchases​ ​with​ ​retailers​ ​or​ ​other​ ​users​ ​(i.e.,​ ​creating​ ​BUY​ ​and​ ​SELL​ ​activities). 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 38 

 



 

 

 

As of middle of Oct 2017, there is an alpha version of the product. The alpha is currently under internal                                       
testing and will be released to a wider audience end of Oct 2017, before ICO start. The product will be                                       
released​ ​in​ ​2018 

 

Value​ ​and​ ​Experience​ ​for​ ​Early​ ​Platform​ ​Users 
While the true value of the ecosystem will take time to attain, reaching a sufficient number of retail                                   
contributors and user participants, we believe there is sufficient value for early adopters of the retail platform.                                 
From the outset, the platform will support peer-to-peer contracts which will provide value in bootstrapping                             
the​ ​retail​ ​marketplace. 

 

Once the platform is launched, team BitClave will shift significant focus to marketing to small and medium                                 
businesses to build the retail side of the marketplace, with the expectation that more retailers will bring more                                   
customers,​ ​leading​ ​to​ ​continued​ ​growth​ ​of​ ​the​ ​ecosystem. 

 

Growth​ ​Plan 
As part of the initial ecosystem bootstrapping, we have already introduced 15-20 small companies for the                               
initial instance of the BASE market. Our team will continue to target industries where significant effort is put                                   
into marketing to individual customers, such as auto sales, real estate, hotels, and retailers like Target that                                 
compete with major ad service providers like Amazon. Once our small market is established, we will increase                                 
our​ ​marketing​ ​efforts​ ​to​ ​continually​ ​expand​ ​the​ ​number​ ​of​ ​players​ ​involved. 

 

New​ ​Opportunity 
BitClave designs and develops an open source decentralized search ecosystem, upon which external                         
developers create apps and services. The core offering includes the framework enabling external                         
developers​ ​to​ ​build​ ​on​ ​top​ ​of​ ​the​ ​platform. 

Fundraiser ​ ​And ​ ​Token​ ​Distribution 
The​ ​ERC-20​ ​tokens​ ​will​ ​be​ ​distributed​ ​no​ ​later​ ​than​ ​4​ ​weeks​ ​after​ ​the​ ​end​ ​of​ ​the​ ​token​ ​sale. 

 

Fundraiser​ ​Schedule 
To date, we have successfully completed a discount token pre-sale event. The full crowdsale is beginning on                                 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 39 

 



 

 

 

November 29th. The fundraiser will continue until the hard cap of 25 million USD is met (or for 60 days). The                                         
official start date will be announced through official BitClave channels. Register at ​fundraiser.bitclave.com for                           
the​ ​latest​ ​announcements​ ​regarding​ ​the​ ​fundraiser. 

 

Token​ ​distribution 
The​ ​ERC-20​ ​tokens​ ​will​ ​be​ ​distributed​ ​no​ ​later​ ​than​ ​4​ ​weeks​ ​after​ ​the​ ​end​ ​of​ ​the​ ​token-sale. 

 

 

   

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 40 

 

https://fundraiser.bitclave.com/
https://fundraiser.bitclave.com/


 

 

 

Team 
BitClave was founded in 2016 with the vision of reimagining the relationship between businesses and                             
customers based on the trust and transparency of Smart Contracts. Our solution has the potential to disrupt                                 
one of the largest markets in the world, the ad network, which is currently monopolized by giant corporations                                   
and​ ​controlled​ ​by​ ​middlemen. 

People and governments around the world have concerns over personal privacy. Much of this concern is                               
attributable​ ​to​ ​the​ ​bait-and-switch​ ​model​ ​of​ ​"free​ ​services"​ ​dealing​ ​in​ ​privacy-invasive​ ​data​ ​mining​ ​practices. 

These practices are justified due to the business economy they are purported to support, but instead                               
contribute to a disjoint promotions and purchases continuum where businesses pay a high price for metrics                               
with little correlation to direct sales while diverting significant resources from quality, loyalty, and value                             
building. 

 

At​ ​our​ ​best,​ ​we​ ​foster​ ​the​ ​social​ ​accountability​ ​and​ ​service  
oriented​ ​qualities​ ​of​ ​the​ ​local​ ​economy​ ​with​ ​a​ ​decentralized  
and​ ​openhanded​ ​approach​ ​to​ ​market​ ​engagement. 

 

For BitClave, the world is a better place if the hidden ad networks are transmuted and elevated into an                                     
activity-driven marketplace where customers and brands, alike, share in value creation while fostering                         
meaningful​ ​relationships​ ​bridging​ ​promotions​ ​and​ ​purchases. 

 

Executive​ ​Team 
The BitClave team consists of 20 engineers and the advisory board of world-class talents in the fields of                                   
security,​ ​payments,​ ​and​ ​blockchain. 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 41 

 



 

 

 

 

CEO,​ ​Alex​ ​Bessonov 

Senior​ ​Executive​ ​with​ ​over​ ​20​ ​years​ ​of​ ​experience​ ​in​ ​the​ ​security,​ ​privacy​ ​and 
blockchain​ ​industry.​ ​Former​ ​CSO​ ​of​ ​LGE. 

 

CTO,​ ​Patrick​ ​Tague 

Associate​ ​Research​ ​Professor​ ​in​ ​the​ ​ECE​ ​Department​ ​at​ ​CMU.​ ​Expert​ ​in 
mobile,​ ​embedded,​ ​and​ ​wireless​ ​security. 

 

Chief​ ​Architect,​ ​Emmanuel​ ​Owusu 

PhD​ ​from​ ​CMU.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​the​ ​fields​ ​of​ ​security,​ ​blockchain,​ ​Internet​ ​of​ ​Things, 
public​ ​policy​ ​and​ ​privacy. 

 

Project​ ​Management,​ ​Vasily​ ​Trofimchuk 

MSc​ ​in​ ​CS,​ ​MBA.​ ​A​ ​serial​ ​entrepreneur.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​advertising,​ ​game​ ​theory, 
blockchain​ ​and​ ​management. 

 

Blockchain​ ​Developer,​ ​Anton​ ​Bukov 

MSc​ ​from​ ​Institute​ ​of​ ​Cryptography,​ ​Telecommunications​ ​and​ ​Computer 
Science.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​data​ ​security​ ​and​ ​processing.​ ​Blockchain​ ​enthusiast​ ​and 
developer 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 42 

 



 

 

 

 

Senior​ ​Developer,​ ​Ivan​ ​Yurin 

Lead​ ​backend​ ​developer,​ ​experience​ ​with​ ​scalable​ ​systems 

 

Core​ ​Developer,​ ​Andrey​ ​Shashlov 

Full​ ​stack​ ​developer​ ​with​ ​focus​ ​on​ ​Android​ ​and​ ​iOS.​ ​Entrepreneur​ ​and 
innovator.​ ​Blockchain​ ​enthusiast. 

 

Data​ ​Architect,​ ​Eugene​ ​Kaganovich 

Full​ ​stack​ ​developer​ ​with​ ​deep​ ​knowledge​ ​of​ ​Java.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​protecting 
enterprise​ ​data​ ​in​ ​the​ ​cloud. 

 

Data​ ​Scientist,​ ​Mark​ ​Shwartzman 

MSc​ ​from​ ​University​ ​of​ ​Tel​ ​Aviv.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​video​ ​compression​ ​and​ ​data 
science.​ ​Bitcoin​ ​enthusiast​ ​and​ ​developer. 

   

 

 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 43 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Expert​ ​Advisors 
 

 

 

Blockchain​ ​Advisor,​ ​Min​ ​Kim 
Co-founder​ ​of​ ​ICON​ ​Foundation.​ ​Chief​ ​Strategy​ ​Officer​ ​at​ ​DAYLI​ ​Financial 
Group.​ ​Partner​ ​at​ ​DAYLI​ ​Venture​ ​Capital. 

 

Strategy​ ​Advisor,​ ​Alex​ ​Shin 
Partner​ ​at​ ​BlockchainPartners​ ​Korea.​ ​Head​ ​of​ ​Operations​ ​at​ ​TeamBlind​ ​Product, 
User​ ​Aquisition/Growth. 

 

 

Blockchain​ ​Advisor,​ ​Greg​ ​Wolfson 
Entrepreneur​ ​and​ ​Blockchain​ ​expert.​ ​Former​ ​Director​ ​of​ ​Business​ ​Development 
at​ ​BTCC 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 44 

 



 

 

 

 

 

Blockchain​ ​Advisor,​ ​Lucas​ ​Hendren 
University​ ​of​ ​Illinois​ ​Alum​ ​Double​ ​Major​ ​in​ ​EE​ ​and​ ​CS​ ​and​ ​Physics.​ ​Blockchain 
entrepreneur​ ​and​ ​expert.​ ​Cofounder​ ​at​ ​SimplyVital​ ​Health. 

 

 

 

Legal​ ​Advisor,​ ​Doug​ ​Park 
PhD​ ​Stanford​ ​GSB,​ ​JD​ ​Michigan.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​corporate​ ​governance,​ ​business 
models,​ ​regulatory​ ​strategy,​ ​and​ ​organizations. 

 

Governance​ ​Advisor,​ ​Gerald​ ​Beuchelt 

CISO​ ​at​ ​LogMeIn.​ ​Former​ ​CISO​ ​at​ ​Demandware.​ ​A​ ​member​ ​of​ ​the​ ​Infragard 
Member​ ​Alliance​ ​Boston​ ​Chapter​ ​Board​ ​of​ ​Directors. 

 

Strategy​ ​Advisor,​ ​Kevin​ ​Doerr 

Microsoft,​ ​Yahoo,​ ​Weather.com​ ​and​ ​GoDaddy​ ​executive.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​user 
experience,​ ​security​ ​and​ ​team​ ​building.​ ​Angel​ ​investor. 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 45 

 



 

 

 

 

Data​ ​Privacy​ ​Advisor,​ ​Balaji​ ​Ganesan 

Serial​ ​entrepreneur.​ ​CEO​ ​of​ ​Privacera.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​data​ ​privacy​ ​and​ ​security. 
Focused​ ​on​ ​GDPR​ ​compliance. 

 

Strategy​ ​Advisor,​ ​Enrico​ ​Ferro 
Head​ ​of​ ​the​ ​Innovation​ ​Development​ ​department​ ​at​ ​Mario​ ​Boella​ ​Institute 
(ISMB).​ ​PhD​ ​from​ ​Politecnico​ ​di​ ​Milano. 

 

Legal​ ​Advisor,​ ​Reza​ ​Dibadj 
Harvard​ ​JD​ ​and​ ​MBA.​ ​Expert​ ​in​ ​solving​ ​complex​ ​problems​ ​in​ ​business​ ​law​ ​and 
business​ ​strategy. 

 

Science​ ​Advisor,​ ​Brad​ ​Gaynor 

PhD​ ​in​ ​EE,​ ​Tufts​ ​University.​ ​Founder​ ​and​ ​CTO​ ​of​ ​Lexumo,​ ​Built​ ​the​ ​Cyber 
Systems​ ​Business​ ​at​ ​Draper​ ​Laboratory. 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 46 

 



 

 

 

 

 

Strategy​ ​Advisor,​ ​Elie​ ​Galam 
Chief​ ​Investment​ ​Officer​ ​of​ ​the​ ​Eastmore​ ​Group.​ ​Masters​ ​in​ ​Applied 
mathematics​ ​Harvard​ ​University. 

 

 
 

 

Glossary 
Activity 

An action in BASE that is recorded into Anonymized Activity Ledger. Activities include both online actions                               
(e.g., search request, view of personalized offer, online purchase) and in-person actions (e.g., visiting a retail                               
store or buying a product). Activities may be associated with customers, businesses, or both (see Activity                               
Definition). 

 

Anonymized​ ​Activity​ ​Ledger  

A decentralized account of relevant customer and retailer activities using anonymization and unlinkability                         
technologies​ ​(see​ ​The​ ​Anonymized​ ​Activity​ ​Ledger). 

 

BitClave​ ​Active​ ​Search​ ​Ecosystem​ ​(BASE) 

Refers to the entire suite of protocols that define the platform for decentralized attestation and search of                                 
activity​ ​data​ ​(also​ ​referred​ ​to​ ​as​ ​Active​ ​Search​ ​or​ ​Decentralized​ ​Search.​ ​See​ ​BASE​ ​Definition). 

 

Consumer​ ​Activity​ ​Token​ ​(CAT) 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 47 

 



 

 

 

The token that underlays all transactions among participating parties. These tokens are used as a form of                                 
rewards​ ​for​ ​the​ ​variety​ ​of​ ​services​ ​available​ ​within​ ​the​ ​Retail​ ​Activity​ ​Market​ ​(see​ ​Token-Driven​ ​BASE). 

 

Retail​ ​Analytics​ ​Provider 

An​ ​entity​ ​that​ ​sells​ ​analytics​ ​capabilities​ ​(see​ ​Retail​ ​Analytics​ ​Providers). 

 

Selective​ ​Linkability​ ​/​ ​Unlinkability  

Group-based access control can be used to control which parties are able to link activities to a common                                   
(though​ ​possibly​ ​unknown)​ ​identity​ ​(see​ ​Ranking​ ​and​ ​Anonymization). 

 

Smart​ ​Contracts 

An automatically enforced agreement among two or more parties in the ecosystem mapping a set of                               
activities​ ​to​ ​ledger​ ​operations​ ​to​ ​be​ ​executed​ ​(see​ ​Smart​ ​Contracts​ ​in​ ​BASE). 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 48 

 



 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Follow​ ​us 
 

http://www.bitclave.com/ 
 

  info@bitclave.com 

  https://github.com/bitclave 

  https://twitter.com/bitclave 

  https://www.facebook.com/bitclave 

  https://linkedin.com/company-beta/6399312/ 

  https://slack.bitclave.com 

  https://t.me/BitClaveCommunity 

  https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCtibs4mNHqbPn-NGnFtK6yg 

  https://bitcointalk.org/index.php?topic=2005370 

 

 

Copyright​ ​©​ ​2017​ ​BitClave,​ ​All​ ​Rights​ ​Reserved​ ​​ ​| 49 

 

http://www.bitclave.com/





